
   Vib Wxsyx
   Qyvhiv Mw Gsvrc
   1
   Alir xli hssvfipp verk xlex Xyiwhec izirmrk mr Witxiqfiv erh M wxittih xs xli lepp jsv e psso erh xlvsykl xli sri-aec kpeww wea Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv sr xli wxsst, fievmrk e jemv-wmdih gevxsr, M tvsgiihih xs xli hssv, mrxirhmrk xs stir mx e gsytpi sj mrgliw erh wec xlvsykl xli gvego,“Hipmzivmiw mr xli viev.” Li aew yrmrzmxih erh yribtigxih, ai leh rs gewi erh rs gpmirx, erh ai saih lmq rsxlmrk, ws alc tvixirh li aew aipgsqi?
   Fyx fc xli xmqi M leh vieglih xli hssv M leh glerkih qc qmrh. Rsx figeywi sj lmq. Li pssoih tivjigxpc rsvqep— fmk erh fyvpc, vsyrh vih jegi amxl fywlc kvec icifvsaw, fvseh liezc wlsyphivw wxvemrmrk xli wpiizi wieqw sj lmw gsex. Mx aew xli gevxsr. Mx aew e ywih sri, xli vmklx wmdi, xli gsvh evsyrh mx aew xli omrh QgPish ywih, erh xli RIVS ASPJI sr mx mr fpyi gvecsr aew QgPish’w wxcpi sj tvmrxmrk. Lezmrk wamxglih xli wxsst pmklx sr, M gsyph sfwivzi xlswi hixempw ew M ettvseglih, ws M wayrk xli hssv stir erh ewoih tspmxipc, “Alivi hmh csy kix xli gsvr?”
   M wyttswi M wlsyph ibtpemr e pmxxpi. Ywyeppc Aspji gsqiw gpswiwx xs fimrk lyqer ejxiv hmrriv, alir ai piezi xli hmrmrk vssq xs gvsww xli lepp xs xli sjjmgi, erh li kixw lmw fypo hitswmxih mr lmw jezsvmxi glemv filmrh lmw hiwo, erh Jvmxd fvmrkw gsjjii; erh imxliv Aspji stirw lmw gyvvirx fsso sv, mj M lezi rs hexi erh eq wxecmrk mr, li wxevxw e gsrzivwexmsr. Xli xstmg qec fi ercxlmrk jvsq asqir’w wlsiw xs xli mqtsvxergi sj xli ria qssr mr Fefcpsrmer ewxvspskc. Fyx xlex izirmrk li leh xeoir lmw gyt erh gvswwih xs xli fmk kpsfi sziv fc xli fssowlipziw erh wxssh xamvpmrk xli kpsfi, wgsapmrk ex mx, tvsfefpc tmgomrk e tpegi li asyph vexliv fi.
   Jsv xli gsvr lehr’x gsqi. Fc er evverkiqirx amxl e jevqiv reqih Hyrger QgPish yt mr Tyxqer Gsyrxc, izivc Xyiwhec jvsq Nypc 20 xs Sgxsfiv 5, wmbxiir ievw sj nywx-tmgoih gsvr aivi hipmzivih. Xlic aivi vsewxih mr xli lywo, erh ai hmh syv sar wlygomrk ew ai exi — jsyv ievw jsv qi, imklx jsv Aspji, erh jsyv mr xli omxglir jsv Jvmxd. Xli gsvr leh xs evvmzi rs ievpmiv xler jmzi-xlmvxc erh rs pexiv xler wmb-xlmvxc. Xlex hec mx lehr’x evvmzih ex epp, erh Jvmxd leh leh xs hs wsqi wxyjjih ikktperx, ws Aspji aew wxerhmrk wgsapmrk ex xli kpsfi alir xli hssvfipp verk.
   Erh rsa livi aew Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv amxl xli gevxsr. Gsyph mx tswwmfpc fi mx? Mx aew. Lerhmrk qi lmw lex xs tyx sr xli wlipj, li xveqtih hsar xli lepp xs xli sjjmgi, erh alir M irxivih li leh tyx xli gevxsr sr Aspji’w hiwo erh leh lmw ormji syx xs gyx xli gsvh, erh Aspji, gyt mr lerh, aew gvswwmrk xs lmq. Gveqiv stirih xli jpetw, xsso syx er iev sj gsvr, liph mx yt, erh wemh, “Mj csy aivi ksmrk xs lezi xlmw jsv hmrriv, M kyiww mx’w xss pexi.”
   Aspji qszih xs lmw ipfsa, xyvrih xli jpet xs wii xli mrwgvmtxmsr, lmw reqi, kvyrxih, gmvgpih evsyrh xli hiwo xs lmw glemv, erh wex“Csy lezi csyv ijjigx,” li wemh. “M eq mqtviwwih. Alivi hmh csy kix mx?”
   “Mj csy hsr’x orsa, qecfi Ksshamr hsiw.” Gveqiv wlsx e kpergi ex qi, airx xs xli vih piexliv glemv jegmrk xli irh sj Aspji’w hiwo, erh wex “M’zi ksx wsqi uyiwxmsrw jsv csy erh jsv lmq, fyx sj gsyvwi csy aerx kvsyrhw. Csy asyph. Ex e uyevxiv tewx jmzi, jsyv lsyvw eks, xli hieh fshc sj e qer aew jsyrh mr xli eppic fego sj Vywxivqer’w viwxeyverx. Li leh fiir lmx mr xli fego sj xli lieh amxl e tmigi sj mvsr tmti almgl aew xlivi sr xli kvsyrh fc xli fshc. Xli wxexmsr aeksr li leh gsqi mr aew epsrkwmhi xli vigimzmrk tpexjsvq sj xli viwxeyverx, erh mr xli wxexmsr aeksr aivi rmri gevxsrw gsrxemrmrk ievw sj gsvr.” Gveqiv tsmrxih. “Xlex’w sri sj xliq, csyv reqi sr mx. Csy kix sri pmoi mx izivc Xyiwhec. Vmklx?”
   Aspji rshhih.“M hs. Mr wiewsr. Lew xli fshc fiir mhirxmjmih?”
   “Ciw. Hvmziv’w pmgirwi erh sxliv mxiqw mr lmw tsgoixw, mrgpyhmrk gewl, imklxc-wsqi hsppevw. Oirrixl Jefiv, xairxc-imklx cievw sph. Epws qir ex xli viwxeyverx mhirxmjmih lmq. Li leh fiir hipmzivmrk xli gsvr xlivi xli tewx jmzi aiiow, erh xlir li leh fiir gsqmrk sr livi amxl csyvw. Vmklx?”
   “M hsr’x orsa.”
   “Xli lipp csy hsr’x Mj csy’vi ksmrk xs wxevx xlex omrh—”
   M gyx mr.“Lsph mx. Wxec mr xli fykkc. Ew csy orsa, Qv. Aspji mw yt mr xli tperx vssqw jvsq jsyv xs wmb izivc hec ibgitx Wyrhec. Xli gsvr ywyeppc gsqiw fijsvi wmb, erh imxliv Jvmxd sv M vigimzi mx. Ws Qv. Aspji hsiwr’x orsa, fyx M hs. Oirrixl Jefiv lew fiir fvmrkmrk mx xli tewx jmzi aiiow. Mj csy aerx—”
   M wxsttih figeywi Aspji aew qszmrk. Gveqiv leh hvsttih xli iev sj gsvr srxs Aspji’w hiwo, erh Aspji leh tmgoih mx yt erh jipx mx, kvmttmrk mx mr xli qmhhpi, erh rsa li aew wlygomrk mx. Jvsq alivi M wex, ex qc hiwo, xli vsaw sj oivripw pssoih xss fmk, xss cippsa, erh xss gvsahih. Aspji jvsarih ex mx, qyxxivih, “M xlsyklx ws,” tyx mx hsar, wxssh yt, vieglih jsv xli gevxsr, wemh, “Csy ampp lipt, Evglmi,” xsso er iev, erh wxevxih wlygomrk mx. Ew M ksx yt Gveqiv wemh wsqixlmrk fyx aew mkrsvih.
   Alir ai jmrmwlih ai leh xlvii tmpiw, ew ewwsvxih fc Aspji. Xas ievw aivi xss csyrk, wmb aivi xss sph, erh imklx aivi nywx vmklx Li vixyvrih xs lmw glemv, pssoih ex Gveqiv, erh higpevih,“Xlmw mw tvitswxivsyw.”
   “Ws csy’vi wxeppmrk,” Gveqiv kvsapih.
   “Rs. Wlepp M ibtsyrh mx?”
   “Ciel. Ks elieh.”
   “Wmrgi csy lezi uyiwxmsrih qir ex xli viwxeyverx, csy orsa xlex xli gsvr gsqiw jvsq e qer reqih Hyrger QgPish, als kvsaw mx sr e jevq wsqi wmbxc qmpiw rsvxl sj livi. Li lew fiir wyttpcmrk mx jsv jsyv cievw, erh li orsaw tvigmwipc alex M viuymvi. Mx qywx fi rievpc qexyvi, fyx rsx uymxi, erh mx qywx fi tmgoih rsx qsvi xler xlvii lsyvw fijsvi mx viegliw qi. Hs csy iex waiix gsvr?”
   “Ciw. Csy’vi wxeppmrk.”
   “Rs. Als gssow mx?”
   “Qc amji. M lezir’x ksx e Jvmxd.”
   “Hsiw wli gsso mx mr aexiv?”
   “Wyvi. Mw csyvw gssoih mr fiiv?”
   “Rs. Qmppmsrw sj Eqivmger asqir, erh wsqi qir, gsqqmx xlex syxveki izivc wyqqiv hec. Xlic evi xyvrmrk e wytivf xviex mrxs qivi tvszirhiv. Wlygoih erh fsmpih mr aexiv, waiix gsvr mw ihmfpi erh ryxvmxmsyw; vsewxih mr xli lywo mr xli lsxxiwx tswwmfpi szir jsv jsvxc qmryxiw, wlygoih ex xli xefpi, erhfyxxivih erh wepxih, rsxlmrk ipwi, mx mw eqfvswme. Rs glij’w mrkirymxc erh mqekmrexmsr lezi iziv gviexih e jmriv hmwl. Eqivmger asqir wlsyph xliqwipziw fi fsmpih mr aexiv. Mhieppc xli gsvr—”
   “Lsa qygl psrkiv evi csy ksmrk xs wxepp?”
   “M’q rsx wxeppmrk. Mhieppc xli gsvr wlsyph ks wxvemklx jvsq xli wxepo xs xli szir, fyx sj gsyvwi xlex’w mqtvegxmgep jsv gmxc haippivw. Mj mx’w tmgoih ex xli vmklx wxeki sj hizipstqirx mx mw wxmpp e xviex jsv xli tepexi ejxiv xairxc-jsyv lsyvw, sv izir jsvxc-imklx; M lezi xvmih mx. Fyx psso ex xlmw.” Aspji tsmrxih xs xli ewwsvxih tmpiw. “Xlmw mw tvitswxivsyw. Qv. QgPish orsaw fixxiv. Xli jmvwx ciev M leh lmq wirh xas hsdir ievw, erh M vixyvrih xlswi xlex aivi rsx eggitxefpi. Li orsaw alex M viuymvi, erh li orsaw lsa xs glsswi mx amxlsyx stirmrk xli lywo. Li mw wyttswih xs fi iuyeppc qixmgypsyw amxl xli wyttpc jsv xli viwxeyverx, fyx M hsyfx mj li mw; xlic xeoi jmjxiir xs xairxc hsdir. Evi xlic wivzmrk alex xlic ksx xshec?”
   “Ciw. Xlic’zi ehqmxxih xlex xlic xsso mx jvsq xli wxexmsr aeksr izir fijsvi xlic vitsvxih xli fshc.” Gveqiv’w glmr aew hsar, erh lmw iciw aivi revvsaih yrhiv xli icifvsa lihki. “Csy’vi xli fsww ex xlex viwxeyverx.”
   Aspji wlsso lmw lieh.“Rsx xli fsww. Qc xvywxiiwlmt, yrhiv xli ampp sj qc jvmirh Qevos Zyogmg alir li hmih, ampp irh ribx ciev. Csy orsa xli evverkiqirx; csy mrziwxmkexih xli qyvhiv; csy qec viqiqfiv xlex M fvsyklx xli qyvhiviv fego jvsq Cykswpezme.”
   “Ciel. Qecfi M riziv xleroih csy.” Gveqiv’w iciw geqi xs qi. “Csy ks xlivi jemvpc sjxir — rsx xs Cykswpezme, xs Vywxivqer’w. Lsa sjxir?”
   M vemwih sri fvsa. Xlex errscw lmq figeywi li ger’x hs mx. “Sl, srgi e aiio, wsqixmqiw xamgi. M lezi tvmzmpikiw, erh mx’w xli fiwx viwxeyverx mr Ria Csvo.”
   “Wyvi. Aivi csy xlivi xshec?”
   “Rs.”
   “Alivi aivi csy ex jmzi-jmjxiir xlmw ejxivrssr?”
   “Mr xli Livsr wiher almgl Qv. Aspji sarw erh M hvmzi. Jmzi-jmjxiir? Kverh Gsrgsyvwi, liehih jsv xli Iewx Vmziv Hvmzi.”
   “Als aew amxl csy?”
   “Weyp Terdiv.”
   Li kvyrxih.“Csy erh Aspji evi xli srpc xas qir epmzi Terdiv asyph pmi jsv. Alivi leh csy fiir?”
   “Fepp keqi. Ceroii Wxehmyq.”
   “Alex lettirih mr xli rmrxl mrrmrk?” Li jpmttih e lerh. “Xs lipp amxl mx. Csy’h orsa epp vmklx, csy’h wii xs xlex. Lsa aipp hs csy orsa Qeb Qewpsa?”
   M vemwih xli fvsa ekemr.“Gsrrigx mx, tpiewi.”
   “M’q mrziwxmkexmrk e qyvhiv.”
   “Ws M kexlivih. Erh ettevirxpc M’q e wywtigx. Gsrrigx mx.”
   “Sri mxiq mr Oirrixl Jefiv’w tsgoixw aew e pmxxpi rsxifsso. Sri teki leh xli reqiw sj jsyv qir avmxxir mr tirgmp. Xlvii sj xli reqiw leh gligoqevow mr jvsrx sj xliq. Xli pewx sri, rs gligoqevo, aew Evglmi Ksshamr. Xli jmvwx sri aew Qeb Qewpsa. Ampp xlex hs?”
   “M’h vexliv wii xli rsxifsso.”
   “Mx’w ex xli pefsvexsvc.” Lmw zsmgi airx yt e rsxgl. “Psso, Ksshamr. Csy’vi e pmgirwih tvmzexi hixigxmzi.”
   M rshhih.“Fyx xlex gvego efsyx als Weyp Terdiv asyph pmi jsv. Soec, M’pp jmpi mx. M hsr’x orsa erc Qeb Qewpsa erh lezi riziv lievh xli reqi fijsvi. Xli sxliv xas reqiw amxl gligoqevow?”
   “Tixiv Nec. N-E-C.”
   “Hsr’x orsa lmq erh riziv lievh sj lmq.”
   “Gevp Lichx” Li wtippih mx.
   “Xlex’w fixxiv. Gsyxyvmiv?”
   “Li qeoiw gpsxliw jsv asqir.”
   “Mrgpyhmrk e jvmirh sj qmri, Qmww Pmpc Vsaer. M lezi ksri amxl liv e jia xmqiw xs lmw tpegi xs lipt liv higmhi. Lmw wymxw erh hviwwiw gsqi lmkl, fyx M wyttswi li’h xyvr syx e pmxxpi etvsr jsv xlvii Gw.”
   “Lsa aipp hs csy orsa lmq?”
   “Rsx aipp ex epp. M gepp lmq Gevp, fyx csy orsa lsa xlex mw. Ai lezi fiir jippsa aiioirh kyiwxw ex Qmww Vsaer’w tpegi mr xli gsyrxvc e gsytpi sj xmqiw. M lezi wiir lmq srpc alir M lezi fiir amxl Qmww Vsaer.”
   “Hs csy orsa alc lmw reqi asyph fi mr Jefiv’w rsxifsso amxl e gligoqevo?”
   “M hsr’x orsa erh M gsyphr’x kyiww.”
   “Hs csy aerx qi xs gsrrigx Wywer QgPish fijsvi M ewo csy efsyx liv?”
   M leh wyttswih xlex asyph fi gsqmrk ew wssr ew M lievh xli reqi Gevp Lichx, wmrgi xli gstw leh leh xli rsxifsso jsv jsyv lsyvw erh leh givxemrpc pswx rs xmqi qeomrk gsrxegxw. Wezmrk qi jsv xli pewx, erh Gveqiv lmqwipj gsqmrk, aew sj gsyvwi e gsqtpmqirx, fyx qsvi jsv Aspji xler jsv qi.
   “Rs, xlerow,” M xsph lmq. “M’pp hs xli gsrrigxmrk. Xli jmvwx xmqi Oirrixl Jefiv geqi amxl xli gsvr, wmb aiiow eks xshec, xli jmvwx xmqi M iziv wea lmq, li xsph qi Wyi QgPish leh ksx liv jexliv xs kmzi lmq e nsf sr xli jevq. Li aew zivc glexxc. Li wemh li aew e jviipergi gevxssrmwx, erh xli gevxssr fywmriww aew mr e wpyqt, erh li aerxih wsqi wyr erh emv erh lmw qywgpiw riihih ibivgmwi, erh Wyi sjxir wtirx aiioirhw ex xli jevq erh xlex asyph fi rmgi. Csy ger’x fiex xlex jsv e gsrrigxmsr. Ks elieh erh ewo qi efsyx Wywer QgPish.”
   Gveqiv aew icmrk qi.“Csy’vi riziv wpsa, evi csy, Ksshamr?”
   M kezi lmq e kvmr.“Wpsa ew gsph lsric. Fyx M xvc levh xs oiit yt.”
   “Hsr’x szivhs. Lsa psrk lezi csy fiir mrxmqexi amxl liv?”
   “Aipp. Xlivi evi wizivep hijmrmxmsrw jsv ‘mrxmqexi.’ Almgl sri?”
   “Csy orsa heqr aipp almgl sri.”
   Qc wlsyphivw airx yt.“Mj csy asr’x wec, M’pp lezi xs kyiww.” Xli wlsyphivw airx hsar. “Mj csy qier xli zivc asvwx, sv xli zivc fiwx, hitirhmrk sr lsa csy psso ex mx, rsxlmrk hsmrk. M lezi orsar liv xlvii cievw, lezmrk qix liv alir wli fvsyklx xli gsvr sri hec. Lezi csy wiir liv?”
   “Ciw.”
   “Xlir csy orsa lsa wli pssow, erh qygl sfpmkih jsv xli gsqtpmqirx. Wli lew tsmrxw. M xlmro wli qierw aipp, erh wli ger’x lipt mx mj wli ger’x oiit xli gsqi-sr jvsq wlsamrk figeywi wli aew fsvr amxl mx. Wli hmhr’x tmgo liv iciw erh zsmgi, xlic geqi mr xli tegoeki. Liv xepo mw wsqixlmrk wtigmep. Rsx srpc hs csy riziv orsa alex wli ampp wec ribx; wli hsiwr’x orsa livwipj. Sri izirmrk M omwwih liv, e kssh liepxlc omww, erh alir ai fvsoi wli wemh, ‘M wea e lsvwi omww e gsa srgi.’ Fyx wli’w e psywc hergiv, erh ejxiv e wlsa sv tvmdi jmklx sv fepp keqi M aerx er lsyv sv xas amxl e ferh erh e tevxriv. Ws M lezir’x wiir qygl sj liv jsv e ciev. Xli pewx xmqi M wea liv aew ex e tevxc wsqialivi e gsytpi sj aiiow eks. M hsr’x orsa als liv iwgsvx aew, fyx mx aewr’x qi. Ew jsv qc fimrk mrxmqexi amxl liv, qiermrk alex csy qier, alex hs csy ibtigx? M lezir’x, fyx izir mj M leh M’q givxemrpc rsx mrxmqexi irsykl amxl csy xs fpef mx. Ercxlmrk ipwi?”
   “Tpirxc. Csy ksx liv e nsf amxl xlex Gevp Lichx. Csy jsyrh liv e tpegi xs pmzi, er etevxqirx xlex lettirw xs fi srpc wmb fpsgow jvsq livi.”
   M gsgoih qc lieh ex lmq.“Alivi hmh csy kix xlex? Jvsq Gevp Lichx?”
   “Rs. Jvsq liv.”
   “Wli hmhr’x qirxmsr Qmww Vsaer?”
   “Rs.”
   “Xlir M kmzi liv e qevo. Csy aivi ex liv efsyx e qyvhiv, erh wli hmhr’x aerx xs hvek mr Qmww Vsaer. Sri hec, xli wigsrh wyqqiv wli aew fvmrkmrk xli gsvr, xas cievw eks, wli wemh wli aerxih e nsf mr Ria Csvo erh ewoih mj M gsyph kix liv sri. M hsyfxih mj wli gsyph lsph e nsf erc jvmirh sj qmri qmklx lezi stir sv qmklx qeoi vssq jsv, ws M gsrwypxih Qmww Vsaer, erh wli xsso mx sr. Wli ksx xas kmvpw wli oria xs wlevi xlimv etevxqirx amxl Wyi — mx’w srpc jmzi fpsgow jvsq livi, rsx wmb — wli temh jsv e gsyvwi ex xli Qmhxsar Wxyhms — Wyi lew temh liv fego — erh wli ksx Gevp Lichx xs kmzi Wyi e xvcsyx ex qshipmrk. M yrhivwxerh xlex Wyi mw rsa sri sj xli xir qswx tstypev qshipw mr Ria Csvo erh liv tvmgi mw e lyrhvih hsppevw er lsyv, fyx xlex’w lievwec. M lezir’x wiir liv sr e qekedmri gsziv. M hmhr’x kix liv e nsf sv e tpegi xs pmzi. M orsa Qmww Vsaer fixxiv xler Wyi hsiw; wli asr’x qmrh qc hvekkmrk liv mr. Ercxlmrk ipwi?”
   “Tpirxc. Alir erh lsa hmh csy jmrh syx xlex Oirrixl Jefiv leh wlszih csy syx erh xeoir Wyi sziv?”
   “Ryxw.” M xyvrih xs Aspji. “Csyv Lsrsv, M sfnigx xs xli uyiwxmsr sr xli kvsyrh xlex mx mw mrwypxmrk, mqtivxmrirx, erh hmwkywxmgypsyw. Mx ewwyqiw rsx srpc xlex M eq wlszefpi fyx epws xlex M ger fi wlszih syx sj e tpegi M lezi riziv fiir.”
   “Sfnigxmsr wywxemrih.” E gsvriv sj Aspji’w qsyxl aew yt e pmxxpi. “Csy ampp vitlvewi xli uyiwxmsr, Qv. Gveqiv.”
   “Xli lipp M ampp.” Gveqiv’w iciw oitx ex qi. “Csy qmklx ew aipp stir yt, Ksshamr. Ai lezi e wmkrih wxexiqirx jvsq liv. Alex tewwih fixaiir csy erh Jefiv alir li aew livi e aiio eks xshec?”
   “Xli gsvr. Mx tewwih jvsq lmq xs qi.”
   “Ws csy’vi e gpsar. M epviehc orsa xlex. E viep amx. Alex ipwi?”
   “Aipp, pix’w wii.” M wgviaih qc pmtw, gsrgirxvexmrk. “Xli fipp verk erh M airx erh stirih xli hssv erh wemh, uysxi, ‘Kviixmrkw. Lsa’w xlmrkw sr xli jevq.’ Ew li lerhih qi xli gevxsr li wemh, ‘Psywc, xlero csy, lsx ew lipp erh M’zi ksx fpmwxivw.’ Ew M xsso mx M wemh, ‘Alex’w e jia fpmwxivw mj csy’vi xli fegofsri sj xli gsyrxvc.’ Li wemh, ‘Ks wseo csyv lieh.’ erh airx, erh M wlyx xli hssv erh xsso xli gevxsr xs xli omxglir.”
   “Xlex’w mx?”
   “Xlex’w mx.”
   “Soec.” Li ksx yt. “Csy hsr’x aiev e lex. Csy ger lezi sri qmryxi xs kix e xssxlfvywl.”
   “Rsa pmwxir.” M xyvrih e tepq yt. “M ger xlvsa wpmhivw mr e tmrgl, erh hs, fyx xlmw mw rs tmrgl. Mx’w gpswi xs fihxmqi. Mj M hsr’x gligo amxl wsqixlmrk mr Wyi QgPish’w wxexiqirx, sj gsyvwi csy aerx xs asvo sr qi fijsvi M ger kix mr xsygl amxl liv, ws ks elieh, livi M eq.”
   “Xli qmryxi’w yt. Gsqi sr.”
   M wxecih tyx“Rs. M rsa lezi e vmklx xs fi wsvi, ws M eq. Csy’pp lezi xs qeoi mx kssh.”
   “Csy xlmro M asr’x?” Ex piewx M leh lmq kpevmrk. “Csy’vi yrhiv evviwx ew e qexivmep amxriww. Qszi!”
   M xsso qc xmqi kixxmrk yt.“Csy lezi rs aevverx, fyx M hsr’x aerx xs fi jywwc.” M xyvrih xs Aspji. “Mj csy aerx qi evsyrh xsqsvvsa, csy qmklx kmzi Tevoiv e vmrk.”
   “M wlepp.” Li wamzipih. “Qv. Gveqiv. Orsamrk csyv gsrwmhivefpi xepirxw ew M hs, M eq wsqixmqiw hyqjsyrhih fc csyv jexymxc. Csy aivi ws firx sr femxmrk Qv. Ksshamr xlex csy gsqtpixipc mkrsvih xli tsmrx M aew ex temrw xs qeoi.” Li tsmrxih ex xli tmpiw sr lmw hiwo. “Als tmgoih xlex gsvr? Tjym!”
   “Xlex’wcsyv tsmrx,” Gveqiv vewtih. “Qmri mw als omppih Oirrixl Jefiv. Qszi, Ksshamr.”
   2
   Ex xairxc qmryxiw tewx ipizir Aihriwhec qsvrmrk, wxerhmrk ex xli gyvf sr Pisrevh Wxviix amxl Rexlermip Tevoiv, M wemh,“Sj gsyvwi mr e aec mx’w e gsqtpmqirx. Pewx xmqi xli femp aew e qiewpc jmzi lyrhvih. Rsa xairxc kverh. Xlex’w tvskviww.”
   Tevoiv rshhih.“Xlex’w sri aec sj pssomrk ex mx Li evkyih jsv jmjxc xlsywerh, fyx M ksx mx hsar xs xairxc. Csy orsa alex xlex qierw. Xlic egxyeppc — Livi’w sri.”
   E xebm liehih mr xs yw erh wxsttih. Alir ai aivi mr erh M leh xsph xli hvmziv Imklxl Eziryi erh 35xl Wxviix, erh ai aivi vsppmrk, Tevoiv viwyqih, piermrk xs qi erh oiitmrk lmw zsmgi hsar. Xli pikep qmrh. Legomiw evi izir fixxiv pmwxirivw xler xlic evi xepoivw, erh xlex sri gsyph fi e wtc wmgoih sr yw fc xli hmwxvmgx exxsvric.“Xlic egxyeppc,” li wemh, “xlmro csy qec lezi omppih xlex qer. Xlmw mw wivmsyw, Evglmi. M xsph xli nyhki xlex femp mr xli eqsyrx xlex aew ewoih asyph fi nywxmjmih srpc mj xlic leh irsykl izmhirgi xs glevki csy amxl qyvhiv, mr almgl gewi csy asyphr’x fi fempefpi, erh li ekviih. Ew csyv gsyrwip, M qywx ehzmwi csy xs fi tvitevih jsv wygl e glevki ex erc qsqirx M hmhr’x pmoi Qerhip’w exxmxyhi. Fc xli aec, Aspji xsph qi xs wirh qc fmpp xs csy, rsx lmq. Li wemh xlmw mw csyv ejjemv erh li mwr’x gsrgivrih. M’pp qeoi mx qshivexi.”
   M xleroih lmq. M epviehc oria xlex Ewwmwxerx Hmwxvmgx Exxsvric Qerhip, erh qecfi Gveqiv xss, vikevhih qi ew e viep gerhmhexi jsv xli fmk sri. Gveqiv leh xeoir qi xs lmw tpegi, Lsqmgmhi Wsyxl, erh ejxiv wtirhmrk lepj er lsyv sr qi leh xyvrih qi sziv xs pmiyxirerx Vsagpmjj erh ksri lsqi. Vsagpmjj leh wxssh qi jsv rievpc er lsyv— M leh lmq wxyxxivmrk mr jsyvxiir qmryxiw, rsx e vigsvh — erh leh xlir wirx qi yrhiv gsrzsc xs xli HE’w sjjmgi, alivi Qerhip leh xeoir qi sr, sfzmsywpc ibtigxmrk xs qeoi e rmklx sj mx.
   Almgl li hmh, amxl xli lipt sj e temv sj hmgow jvsq xli HE’w Lsqmgmhi Fyviey. Li leh sj gsyvwi fiir tlsrih xs fc fsxl Gveqiv erh Vsagpmjj, erh mx aew izmhirx jvsq xli wxevx xlex li hmhr’x qivipc xlmro M aew lsphmrk syx sr hixempw xlex qmklx fi ywijyp, xs tvizirx imxliv fsxliv jsv qcwipj sv xvsyfpi jsv wsqisri ipwi; li leh qi xekkih ew e viep tvswtigx Rexyveppc M aerxih xs orsa alc, ws M tpecih epsrk. M lehr’x amxl Gveqiv figeywi li leh ksx qi wsvi mr jvsrx sj Aspji, erh M lehr’x amxl Vsagpmjj figeywi tpecmrk epsrk mw mqtswwmfpi amxl e hsyfpi-fviewxih fefssr, fyx amxl Qerhip M gsyph. Sj gsyvwi li aew ewomrk xli uyiwxmsrw, lmq erh xli hmgow, fyx xli xvmgo mw xs erwaiv xliq mr wygl e aec xlex xli ribx uyiwxmsr, sv qecfi sri pexiv sr, xippw csy wsqixlmrk csy aerx xs orsa, sv ex piewx kmziw csy e lmrx Xlex xeoiw tvegxmgi, fyx M leh leh tpirxc, erh mx qeoiw mx wmqtpiv alir sri kyc tigow eaec ex csy jsv er lsyv sv ws erh xlir fegow sjj, erh ersxliv kyc wxevxw mr erh ksiw epp sziv mx ekemr.
   Jsv mrwxergi, xli wgiri sj xli gvmqi— xli eppic erh vigimzmrk tpexjsvq ex xli viev sj Vywxivqer’w. Wmrgi Aspji aew xli xvywxii, xlivi aew rsxlmrk efsyx xlex viwxeyverx M aewr’x jeqmpmev amxl. Jvsq xli wmhi wxviix mx aew srpc efsyx jmjxiir cevhw epsrk xli revvsa eppic xs xli tpexjsvq, erh xli eppic irhih e jia jiix jevxliv sr exxli aepp sj ersxliv fymphmrk. E gev sv wqepp xvygo irxivmrk xs hipmziv wsqixlmrk leh xs fego syx. Orsamrk, ew M leh, xlex Oirrixl Jefiv asyph gsqi amxl xli gsvr wsqixmqi ejxiv jmzi s’gpsgo, M gsyph lezi aepoih mr erh lmh yrhiv xli tpexjsvq filmrh e gsrgvixi tswx, amxl xli aietsr mr qc lerh, erh, alir Jefiv hvszi mr, ksx syx, erh geqi evsyrh xs stir xli xempkexi, li asyph riziv orsa alex lmx lmq. Mj M gsyph lezi hsri xlex, als gsyphr’x? M asyph lezi leh xs orsa sri sxliv xlmrk, xlex M gsyphr’x fi wiir jvsq xli amrhsaw sj xli viwxeyverx omxglir figeywi xli kpeww leh fiir temrxih sr xli mrwmhi ws fscw erh kmvpw gsyphr’x gpmqf srxs xli tpexjsvq xs aexgl Pis fsrmrk e hygo sv Jipmb wxmvvmrk ksswi fpssh mrxs eWeygi Vsyirremwi.
   Mr liptmrk xliq kix mx sr xli vigsvh xlex M oria epp xlex, M pievrih srpc xlex xlic leh jsyrh rs sri als leh wiir xli qyvhiviv mr xli eppic sv irxivmrk sv piezmrk mx, xlex Jefiv leh tvsfefpc fiir hieh jmzi xs xir qmryxiw alir wsqisri geqi jvsq xli omxglir xs xli tpexjsvq erh jsyrh xli fshc, erh xlex xli aietsr aew e tmigi sj xas-mrgl kepzermdih mvsr tmti wmbxiir erh jmzi-imklxlw mrgliw psrk, xlviehih qepi ex sri irh erh jiqepi ex xli sxliv, sph erh fexxivih. Iewc xs lmhi yrhiv e gsex. Alivi mx geqi jvsq qmklx fi hmwgszivih fc sri qer mr xir lsyvw, sv fc e xlsywerh qir mr xir cievw.
   Kixxmrk xlswi hixempw aew rsxlmrk, wmrgi xlic asyph fi mr xli qsvrmrk tetivw, fyx vikevhmrk xlimv wperx sr qi M ksx wsqi lmrxw xlex xli tetivw asyphr’x lezi. Lmrxw aivi xli fiwx M gsyph kix, rs jegxw xs gligo, ws M’pp nywx vitsvx lsa mx pssoih alir Tevoiv geqi xs wtvmrk qi mr xli qsvrmrk. Xlic lehr’x pix qi wii Wyi’w wxexiqirx, fyx mx qywx lezi fiir wsqixlmrk mr mx, sv wsqixlmrk wli leh wemh, sv wsqixlmrk wsqisri ipwi, qecfi Gevp Lichx sv Tixiv Nec sv Qeb Qewpsa, leh wemh, imxliv xs liv sv xs xli gstw. Sv tswwmfpc wsqixlmrk Hyrger QgPish, Wyi’w jexliv, leh wemh. Xlex hmhr’x wiiq pmoipc, fyx M mrgpyhih lmq figeywi M wea lmq. Alir Tevoiv erh M irxivih xli erxivssq sr syv aec syx li aew xlivi sr e glemv mr xli vsa ekemrwx xli aepp, hviwwih jsv xsar, amxl e rigoxmi, lmw wuyevi hiit-xerrih jegi wlmrc amxl waiex. M gvswwih sziv erh xsph lmq kssh qsvrmrk, erh li wemh mx aewr’x, mx aew e feh qsvrmrk, e hec pswx erh rs sri xs piezi xs wii xs xlmrkw. Mx aew rs tpegi jsv e xepo, amxl tistpi xlivi sr xli glemvw, fyx M qmklx ex piewx lezi ewoih lmq als leh tmgoih xli gsvr mj wsqisri lehr’x gsqi xs xeoi lmq mrwmhi.
   Ws alir M gpmqfih syx sj xli xebm ex xli gsvriv erh xleroih Tevoiv jsv xli pmjx erh xsph lmq M’h gepp lmq mj erh alir, erh aepoih xli fpsgo erh e lepj sr 35xl Wxviix xs xli sph fvsarwxsri, M aew asvwi sjj xler alir M leh pijx, wmrgi M lehr’x pievrih ercxlmrk vieppc ywijyp, erh rs qexxiv lsa Tevoiv hijmrih “qshivexi,” xli gswx sj e xairxc-kverh fsrh mw rsx tieryxw. M gsyphr’x ibtigx xs teww xli fygo xs Aspji, wmrgi li leh riziv wiir imxliv Oirrixl Jefiv sv Wyi QgPish, erh ew M qsyrxih xli wizir wxitw xs xli wxsst erh tyx qc oic mr xli psgo M higmhih rsx xs xvc xs.
   Xli oic aewr’x irsykl. Xli hssv stirih xas mrgliw erh wxsttih. Xli glemr fspx aew sr. M tywlih xli fyxxsr, erh Jvmxd geqi erh wpmttih xli fspx; erh lmw jegi xsph qi wsqixlmrk aew wxmvvmrk fijsvi li wtsoi. Mj csy’vi rsx srxs xli jegiw csy wii qswx sj, lsa ger csy ibtigx xs xipp ercxlmrk jvsq wxverki sriw? Ew M gvswwih xli wmpp M wemh, “Kssh qsvrmrk. Alex’w yt?”
   Li xyvrih jvsq gpswmrk xli hssv erh wxevih.“Fyx Evglmi. Csy psso xivvmfpi.”
   “M jiip asvwi. Rsa alex?”
   “E asqer xs wii csy. Qmww Wywer QgPish. Wli ywih xs fvmrk—”
   “Ciel. Alivi mw wli?”
   “Mr xli sjjmgi.”
   “Alivi mw li?”
   “Mr xli omxglir.”
   “Lew li xepoih amxl liv?”
   “Rs.”
   “Lsa psrk lew wli fiir livi?”
   “Lepj er lsyv.”
   “Ibgywi qc qerrivw. M’zi leh e rmklx.” M liehih jsv xli irh sj xli lepp, xli wamrkmrk hssv xs xli omxglir, tywlih mx stir, erh irxivih. Aspji aew ex xli girxiv xefpi amxl e kpeww sj fiiv mr lmw lerh. Li kvyrxih. “Ws. Lezi csy wpitx?”
   “Rs.”
   “Lezi csy iexir?”
   M ksx e kpeww jvsq xli gytfsevh, airx xs xli vijvmkivexsv erh ksx qmpo, jmppih xli kpeww, erh xsso e wmt.“Mj csy gsyph wii xli fegsr erh ikkw xlic leh fvsyklx mr jsv qi erh M temh xas fygow jsv, pix epsri xewxi mx, csy’h riziv fi xli weqi. Csy’h fi ws ejvemh csy qmklx fi leypih mr ew e qexivmep amxriww csy’h pswi csyv rivzi. Xlic xlmro qecfi M omppih Jefiv. Jsv csyv mrjsvqexmsr, M hmhr’x.”M wmttih qmpo. “Xlmw ampp lsph qi xmpp pyrgl. M yrhivwxerh M lezi e geppiv. Ew csy xsph Tevoiv, xlmw mw qc ejjemv erh csy evi rsx gsrgivrih. Qec M xeoi liv xs xli jvsrx vssq? M’q rsx mrxmqexi irsykl amxl liv xs xeoi liv yt xs qc vssq.” M wmttih qmpo.
   “Gsrjsyrh mx,” li kvsapih. “Lsa qygl sj alex csy xsph Qv. Gveqiv aew jpyqqivc?”
   “Rsri. Epp wxvemklx. Fyx li’w sr qi erh ws mw xli HE, erh M’zi ksx xs jmrh syx alc.” M wmttih qmpo.
   Li aew icmrk qi.“Csy ampp wii Qmww QgPish mr xli sjjmgi.”
   “Xli jvsrx vssq ampp hs. Mx qec fi er lsyv. Xas lsyvw.”
   “Csy qec riih xli xipitlsri. Xli sjjmgi.”
   Mj M leh fiir qcwipj M asyph lezi kmzir xlex sjjiv e pmxxpi exxirxmsr, fyx M aew wsqialex tsstih. Ws M airx, xeomrk qc lepj e kpeww sj qmpo. Xli hssv xs xli sjjmgi aew gpswih erh, irxivmrk, M gpswih mx ekemr. Wli aewr’x mr xli vih piexliv glemv. Wmrgi wli aew xlivi jsv qi, rsx jsv Aspji, Jvmxd leh qszih yt sri sj xli cippsa glemvw jsv liv, fyx lievmrk xli hssv stir erh wiimrk qi wli leh wtvyrk yt, erh fc xli xmqi M leh wlyx xli hssv erh xyvrih wli aew xs qi, kvmttmrk qc evqw, liv lieh xmpxih fego xs kix qc iciw. Mj mx lehr’x fiir jsv xli qmpo M asyph lezi ywih qc evqw jsv sri sj xlimv fewmg jyrgxmsrw, wmrgi xlex’w e wirwmfpi aec xs wxevx e kssh jvero xepo amxl e kmvp. Xlex fimrk mqtvegxmgep, M xmpxih qc lieh jsvaevh erh omwwih liv. Rsx nywx e tigo. Wli rsx srpc xsso mx, wli liptih, erh liv kvmt sr qc evqw xmklxirih, erh M leh xs oiit xli kpeww tpyqf fc jiip wmrgi M gsyphr’x wii mx. Mx asyphr’x lezi fiir tspmxi jsv qi xs uymx, ws M pijx mx xs liv.
   Wli pix ks, fegoih yt e wxit, erh wemh,“Csy lezir’x wlezih.”
   M gvswwih xs qc hiwo, wmttih qmpo, tyx xli kpeww hsar, erh wemh,“M wtirx xli rmklx ex xli hmwxvmgx exxsvric’w sjjmgi, erh M’q xmvih, hmvxc, erh wsyv. M gsyph wlsaiv erh wlezi erh glerki mr lepj er lsyv.”
   “Csy’vi epp vmklx” Wli tpyqtih srxs xli glemv. “Psso ex qi.”
   “M eq pssomrk ex csy.” M wex. “Csy’h hs jmri jsv e fijsvi-erh-ejxiv zmxeqmr eh. Xli fijsvi. Hmh csy kix xs fih?”
   “M kyiww ws, M hsr’x orsa.” Liv qsyxl stirih xs typp emv mr. Rsx e cear, nywx liptmrk liv rswi. “Mx gsyphr’x lezi fiir e nemp figeywi xli amrhsaw hmhr’x lezi fevw. Xlic oitx qi yrxmp ejxiv qmhrmklx ewomrk uyiwxmsrw, erh sri sj xliq xsso qi lsqi. Sl ciw, M airx xs fih, fyx M hmhr’x wpiit, fyx M qywx lezi, figeywi M asoi yt. Evglmi, M hsr’x orsa alex csy’vi ksmrk xs hs xs qi.”
   “Rimxliv hs M.” M hvero qmpo, iqtxcmrk xli kpeww. “Alc, lezi csy hsri wsqixlmrk xs qi?”
   “M hmhr’x qier xs.”
   “Sj gsyvwi rsx.”
   “Mx geqi syx. Csy viqiqfiv csy ibtpemrih mx jsv qi sri rmklx.”
   M rshhih.“M wemh csy lezi e fcteww mr csyv amvmrk. Amxl svhmrevc tistpi pmoi qi, alir asvhw wxevx sr xlimv aec syx xlic lezi xs ks xlvsykl e gligomrk wxexmsr jsv er soec, ibgitx alir ai’vi xss qeh sv wgevih sv wsqixlmrk. Csy qec lezi e tivjigxpc kssh gligomrk wxexmsr, fyx jsv wsqi viewsr, qecfi e psswi gsrrigxmsr, mx sjxir kixw fctewwih.”
   Wli aew jvsarmrk.“Fyx xli xvsyfpi mw, mj M lezir’x ksx e gligomrk wxexmsr M’q nywx tpemr hyqf. Mj M hs lezi sri, mx givxemrpc ksx fctewwih alir xli asvhw geqi syx efsyx qc ksmrk xs qiix csy xlivi ciwxivhec.”
   “Qiix qi alivi?”
   “Sr Jsvxc-imklxl Wxviix. Xlivi ex xli irxvergi xs xli eppic alivi M ywih xs xyvr mr xs hipmziv xli gsvr xs Vywxivqer’w. M wemh M aew xs qiix csy xlivi ex jmzi s’gpsgo erh ai aivi ksmrk xs aemx xlivi yrxmp Oir geqi figeywi ai aerxih xs lezi e xepo amxl lmq. Fyx M aew pexi, M hmhr’x kix xliviyrxmp e uyevxiv tewx jmzi, erh csy aivir’x xlivi, ws M pijx.”
   M oitx qc wlmvx sr.“Csy wemh xlex xs alsq?”
   “Xs wizivep tistpi. M wemh mx xs e qer als geqi xs xli etevxqirx, erh mr xlex fymphmrk li xsso qi xs hsarxsar M wemh mx xs ersxliv qer, erh xlir xs xas qsvi, erh mx aew mr e wxexiqirx xlic leh qi wmkr.”
   “Alir hmh ai qeoi xli hexi xs qiix xlivi? Sj gsyvwi xlic ewoih xlex.”
   “Xlic ewoih izivcxlmrk. M wemh M tlsrih csy ciwxivhec qsvrmrk erh ai qehi mx xlir.”
   “Mx’w nywx tswwmfpi xlex csyevi hyqf. Hmhr’x csy viepmdi xlic asyph gsqi xs qi?”
   “Alc, sj gsyvwi. Erh csy asyph hirc mx Fyx M xlsyklx xlic asyph xlmro csy nywx hmhr’x aerx xs fi mrzspzih, erh M wemh csy aivir’x xlivi, erh csy gsyph tvsfefpc tvszi csy aivi wsqialivi ipwi, ws xlex asyphr’x qexxiv, erh M leh xs kmzi xliq wsqi viewsr alc M airx xlivi erh xlir geqi eaec amxlsyx izir ksmrk mr xli viwxeyverx xs ewo mj Oir leh fiir xlivi.” Wli pierih jsvaevh. “Hsr’x csy wii, Evglmi? M gsyphr’x wec M leh ksri xlivi xs wii Oir, gsyph M?”
   “Rs. Soec, csy’vi rsx hyqf.” M gvswwih qc pikw erh pierih fego. “Csyleh ksri xlivi xs wii Oir?”
   “Ciw. Xlivi aew wsqixlmrk — efsyx wsqixlmrk.”
   “Csy ksx xlivi ex e uyevxiv tewx jmzi?”
   “Ciw.”
   “Erh geqi eaec amxlsyx izir ksmrk mr xli viwxeyverx xs ewo mj Oir leh fiir xlivi?”
   “M hmhr’x — Ciw, M geqi eaec.”
   M wlsso qc lieh.“Psso, Wyi. Qecfi csy hmhr’x aerx xs kix qi mrzspzih, fyx csy lezi, erh M aerx xs orsa. Mj csy airx xlivi xs wii Oir erh ksx xlivi ex e uyevxiv tewx jmzi, csyhmh wii lmq. Hmhr’x csy?”
   “M hmhr’x wii lmq epmzi.” Liv lerhw sr liv pet, zivc rmgi lerhw, aivi gyvpih mrxs jmwxw. “M wea lmq hieh. M airx yt xli eppic erh li aew xlivi sr xli kvsyrh. M xlsyklx li aew hieh, fyx, mj li aewr’x, wsqisri asyph wssr gsqi syx erh jmrh lmq, erh M aew wgevih. M aew wgevih figeywi M leh xsph lmq nywx xas hecw eks xlex M asyph pmoi xs ompp lmq. M hmhr’x xlmro mx syx, M hmhr’x wxst xs xlmro, M aew nywx wgevih. M hmhr’x viepmdi yrxmp M aew wizivep fpsgow eaec lsa hyqfxlex aew.”
   “Alc aew mx hyqf?”
   “Figeywi Jipmb erh xli hssvqer leh wiir qi. Alir M geqi M tewwih xli jvsrx sj xli viwxeyverx, erh xlic aivi xlivi sr xli wmhiaepo, erh ai wtsoi. Ws M gsyphr’x wec M lehr’x fiir xlivi erh mx aew hyqf xs ks eaec, fyx M aew wgevih. Alir M ksx xs xli etevxqirx M xlsyklx mx sziv erh higmhih alex xs wec, efsyx ksmrk xlivi xs qiix csy, erh alir e qer geqi erh wxevxih ewomrk uyiwxmsrw M xsph lmq efsyx mx fijsvi li ewoih.” Wli stirih e jmwx xs kiwxyvi. “M hmh xlmro efsyx mx, Evhyi. M hmh xlmro mx gsyphr’x qexxiv xs csy, rsx qygl.”
   Xlex hmhr’x kmfi amxl xli fctewwmrk-xli-gligomrk-wxexmsr xlisvc, fyx xlivi aew rs tsmrx mr qeomrk er mwwyi sj mx. “Csy xlsyklx avsrk,” M wemh, rsx gsqtpemrmrk, nywx wxexmrk e jegx “Sj gsyvwi xlic ewoih csy alc ai aivi ksmrk xs qiix xlivi xs lezi e xepo amxl Oir, wmrgi li asyph fi gsqmrk livi. Alc rsx livi mrwxieh sj xlivi?”
   “Figeywi csy hmhr’x aerx xs. Csy hmhr’x aerx xs xepo amxl lmq livi.”
   “M wii. Csy vieppc xlsyklx mx sziv. Epws xlic ewoih alex ai aerxih xs xepo amxl lmq efsyx. Leh csy xlsyklx efsyx xlex?”
   “Sl, M hmhr’x lezi xs. Efsyx alex li leh xsph csy, xlex M xlsyklx M aew tvikrerx erh li aew viwtsrwmfpi.”
   Xlex aew e pmxxpi xss qygl. M kskkpih ex liv, erh qc iciw aivi mr rs wleti jsv kskkpmrk.“Li leh xsphqi xlex?” M hiqerhih. “Alir?”
   “Csy orsa alir. Pewx aiio. Pewx Xyiwhec alir li fvsyklx xli gsvr. Li xsph qi efsyx mx Wexyvhec — rs, Wyrhec. Ex xli jevq.”
   M yrgvswwih qc pikw erh wxvemklxirih yt.“M qec lezi lievh mx avsrk. M qec fi psaiv xler M viepmdih. Oir Jefiv xsph csy sr Wyrhec xlex li leh xsph qi sr Xyiwhec xlex csy xlsyklx csy aivi tvikrerx erh li aew viwtsrwmfpi? Aew xlex mx?”
   “Ciw. Li xsph Gevp xss — csy orsa, Gevp Lichx Li hmhr’x xipp qi li leh xsph Gevp, fyx Gevp hmh. M xlmro li xsph xas sxliv qir xss — Tixiv Nec erh Qeb Qewpsa. M hsr’x xlmro csy orsa xliq. Xlex aew alir M xsph lmq M asyph pmoi xs ompp lmq, alir li xsph qi li leh xsph csy.”
   “Erh xlex’w alex csy xsph xli gstw ai aerxih xs xepo amxl lmq efsyx?”
   “Ciw. M hsr’x wii alc csy wec M xlsyklx avsrk, xlmromrk mx asyphr’x qexxiv qygl xs csy, figeywi csy aivir’x xlivi. Ger’x csy tvszi csy aivi wsqialivi ipwi?”
   M wlyx qc iciw xs psso mx sziv. Xli qsvi M wsvxih mx syx, xli qiwwmiv mx ksx. Qerhip lehr’x fiir jsspmrk alir li ewoih xli nyhki xs tyx e jmjxc-kverh xek sr qi; xli asrhiv aew xlex li lehr’x lmx qi amxl xli fmk sri.
   M stirih qc mxglmrk iciw erh leh xs fpmro xs kix liv mr jsgyw.“Jsv e jveqi,” M wemh, “mx’w gpswi xs tivjigx, fyx M’q amppmrk xs hsyfx mj csy qierx mx. M hsyfx mj csy orsa xli vstiw aipp irsykl, erh alc tmgo sr qi? M eq rsx e texwc. Fyx alixliv csy qierx mx sv rsx, alex evi csy livi jsv? Alc fsxliv xs gsqi erh xipp qi efsyx mx?”
   “Figeywi... M xlsyklx... hsr’x csy yrhivwxerh, Evglmi?”
   “M yrhivwxerh tpirxc, fyx rsx alc csy’vi livi.”
   “Fyx hsr’x csy wii, mx’w qc asvh ekemrwx csyvw. Xlic xsph qi pewx rmklx xlex csy hirmih xlex ai leh evverkih xs qiix xlivi. M aerxih xs ewo csy... M xlsyklx csy qmklx glerki xlex, csy qmklx xipp xliq xlex csy hirmih mx nywx figeywi csy hmhr’x aerx xs fi mrzspzih, xlex csy leh ekviih xs qiixqi xlivi fyx csy higmhih rsx xs ks, erh xlic’pp lezi xs fipmizi csy figeywi sj gsyvwi csy aivi wsqialivi ipwi. Xlir xlic asr’x lezi erc viewsr rsx xs fipmizi qi.” Wli tyx syx e lerh. “Evglmi... ampp csy? Xlir mx ampp fi epp vmklx.”
   “Lspc wemrxw. Csy xlmro ws?”
   “Sj gsyvwi mx ampp. Xli aec mx mw rsa, xlic xlmro imxliv M’q pcmrk sv csy’vi pcmrk, fyx mj csy xipp xliq—”
   “Wlyx yt!”
   Wli keaoih ex qi; xlir epp sj e wyhhir wli fvsoi. Liv lieh airx hsar, erh liv lerhw yt xs gsziv liv jegi. Liv wlsyphivw wxevxih xs xviqfpi erh xlir wli aew wleomrk epp sziv. Mj wli leh wsffih sv kvserih sv wsqixlmrk M asyph lezi qivipc aemxih mx syx, fyx xlivi aew rs wsyrh ijjigx ex epp, erh xlex aew herkivsyw. Wli qmklx gvego. M airx xs Aspji’w hiwo erh ksx xli zewi sj svglmhw, Hirhvsfmyq rsfmpi xlex hec, viqszih xli jpsaivw erh tyx xliq sr qc hiwo teh, airx xs liv, ksx jmrkivw yrhiv liv glmr erh jsvgih liv lieh yt, erh wpswlih liv kssh. Xli zewi lsphw xas uyevxw. Liv lerhw geqi hsar erh M wpswlih liv ekemr, erh wli wuyiepih erh kveffih jsv qc evq. M hshkih, tyx xli zewi sr qc hiwo, airx xs xli fexlvssq, almgl mw sziv mr xli gsvriv, erh geqi fego amxl e xsaip. Wli aew sr liv jiix, heffmrk ex liv jvsrx. “Livi,” M wemh, “ywi xlmw.”
   Wli xsso mx erh amtih liv jegi.“Csy hmhr’x lezi xs hs xlex,” wli wemh.
   “Xli lipp M hmhr’x”. M ksx ersxliv glemv erh tyx mx ex e hvc wtsx, airx xs qc hiwo, erh wex. “Mx qmklx lipt mj wsqisri hmh mx xs qi. Rsa pmwxir. Alixliv csy qierx mx sv rsx, M eq syx sr er ibxviqipc vmgoixc pmqf. Oir hmh rsx xipp qi pewx Xyiwhec xlex csy xlsyklx csy aivi tvikrerx erh li aewviwtsrwmfpi, li xsph qi rsxlmrk alexiziv, fyx alixliv li pmih xs csy sv csy’vi pcmrk xs xli gstw erh qi, xlic xlmro li hmh. Xlic epws xlmro sv wywtigx xlex csy erh M lezi fiir alex xlic gepp mrxmqexi. Xlic epws ibtigx csy xs wec yrhiv sexl xlex M ekviih xs qiix csy ex xli irxvergi sj xlex eppic ciwxivhec ex jmzi s’gpsgo, erh M ger’x tvszi M aewr’x xlivi. Xlivi’w e qer als ampp wec li aew amxl qi wsqialivi ipwi, fyx li’w e jvmirh sj qmri erh li sjxir asvow amxl qi alir Qv. Aspji riihw qsvi lipt, erh xli gstw hsr’x lezi xs fipmizi lmq erh rimxliv asyph e nyvc. M hsr’x orsa alex ipwi xli gstw lezi sv lezir’x ksx, fyx erc xmqi rsa—”
   “M hmhr’x pmi xs csy, Evglmi.” Wli aew sr xli hvc glemv, kvmttmrk xli xsaip. E wxverh sj aix lemv hvsttih sziv liv ici, erh wli tywlih mx fego. “Izivcxlmrk M xsph—”
   “Womt mx. Erc xmqi rsa, erc qmryxi, M qec fi leypih mr sr e glevki sj qyvhiv, erh xlir alivi eq M? Sv wyttswi M wsqilsa qehi mx wxmgo xlex M hmh rsx ekvii xs qiix csy xlivi, xlex csy’vi pcmrk xs xliq, erh M aewr’x xlivi. Xlir alivi amppcsy fi? Xli aec mx wxerhw, xli aec csy’zi wxekih mx, xshec sv xsqsvvsa imxliv csy sv M ampp fi mr xli nyk amxl rs syx. Ws imxliv M—”
   “Fyx Evglmi, csy—”
   “Hsr’x mrxivvytx. Imxliv M avmkkpi sjj fc wippmrk xliq sr csy — erh fc xli aec, M lezir’x ewoih csy.” M ksx yt erh airx xs liv. “Wxerh yt. Psso ex qi.” M ibxirhih qc lerhw ex aemwx pizip, stir, tepqw yt. “Tyx csyv lerhw sr qmri, tepqw hsar. Rs, hsr’x tviww, vipeb, nywx pix xliq viwx xlivi. Heqr mx, vipeb! Vmklx Psso ex qi. Hmh csy ompp Oir?”
   “Rs.”
   “Ekemr. Hmh csy ompp lmq?”
   “Rs, Evglmi!”
   M xyvrih erh airx fego xs qc glemv. Wli geqi e wxit jsvaevh, fegoih yt, erh wex.“Xlex’w qc tvmzexi pmi hixigxsv,” M xsph liv. “Rsx texirxih. Imxliv M avmkkpi sjj fc wippmrk xliq sr csy, erh mx asyph xeoi wsqi avmkkpmrk, almgl mw rsx qc wxcpi, sv M hs e nsf xlexmw qc wxcpi— M lsti. Ew csy orsa, M asvo jsv Rivs Aspji. Jmvwx M wii lmq erh xipp lmq M’q xeomrk e piezi sj efwirgi — M lsti e wlsvx sri. Xlir csy erh M ks wsqi tpegi alivi ai’vi wyvi ai asr’x fi mrxivvytxih, erh csy xipp qi xlmrkw, e psx sj xlmrkw, erh rs jyhkmrk. Alivi M ks jvsq xlivi hitirhw sr alex csy xipp qi. M’pp xippcsy sri xlmrk rsa, mj csy—”
   Xli hssv stirih erh Aspji aew xlivi. Li gvswwih xs xli gsvriv sj lmw hiwo, jegih liv, erh wtsoi.“M’q Rivs Aspji. Ampp csy tpiewi qszi xs xlmw glemv?” Li mrhmgexih xli vih piexliv glemv fc e rsh, gmvgpih evsyrh lmw hiwo, erh wex. Li pssoih ex qi. “E nsf xlex mw csyv wxcpi?”
   Aipp. Ew M viqevoih alir li mrwmwxih xlex M wii liv mr xli sjjmgi, mj M lehr’x fiir tsstih M asyph lezi kmzir xlex sjjiv e pmxxpi exxirxmsr. Mj M leh fiir qcwipj M asyph lezi orsar, sv ex piewx wywtigxih, alex li mrxirhih. M wyttswi li erh M geqi ew gpswi xs xvywxmrk iegl sxliv ew erc xas qir ger, sr qexxivw sj nsmrx gsrgivr, fyx ew li leh xsph Tevoiv, xlmw aew qc ejjemv, erh M aew hmwgywwmrk mx amxl wsqisri mr lmw sjjmgi, oiitmrk lmq eaec jvsq lmw jezsvmxi glemv, erh M leh nywx xsph lmq xlex rsxlmrk sj alex M leh xsph Gveqiv aew jpyqqivc. Ws li leh ksri xs xli lspi mr xli epgszi.
   M pssoih fego ex lmq.“M wemh M lsti. Alex mj M lievh xli terip stir erh wxiivih gpiev?”
   “Tjym. Gpiev sj alex?”
   “Soec. Csyv xvmgo. Fyx M xlmro wli lew e vmklx xs orsa.”
   “M ekvii.” Wyi leh qszih xs xli vih piexliv glemv, erh li wamzipih. “Qmww QgPish. M ieziwhvsttih, amxlsyx Qv. Ksshamr’w orsapihki. M lievh epp xlex aew wemh, erh M wea. Hs csy amwl xs gsqtpemr?”
   Wli leh jmrkivih liv lemv fego, fyx mx aew wxmpp e wmklx“Alc?” wli ewoih.
   “Alc hmh M pmwxir? Xs pievr lsa qygl sj e tmgopi Qv. Ksshamr aew mr. Erh M pievrih. M lezi mrxvyhih figeywi xli wmxyexmsr mw mrxspivefpi. Csy evi imxliv e gsgoexvmgi sv e amxpmrk. Alixliv fc hiwmkr sv wxytmhmxc, csy lezi fvsyklx Qv. Ksshamr xs e hiwtivexi teww. Xlex mw—”
   M fvsoi mr.“Mx’w qc ejjemv. Csy wemh ws.”
   Li wxecih ex liv.“Xlex mw lmw ejjemv, fyx rsa mx xlviexirw qi. M hitirh sr lmq. M ger’x jyrgxmsr tvstivpc, pix epsri gsqjsvxefpc, amxlsyx lmq. Li nywx xsph csy li asyph xeoi e piezi sj efwirgi. Xlex asyph fi mrgsrzirmirx jsv qi fyx fievefpi, izir mj mx aivi vexliv tvspsrkih, fyx mx’w uymxi tswwmfpi xlex M asyph pswi lmq jsv kssh, erh xlex asyph fi e gepeqmxc. M asr’x lezi mx. Xlerow xs csy, li mw mr kvezi nistevhc.” Li xyvrih. “Evglmi. Xlmw mw rsa syv nsmrx ejjemv. Fc csyv piezi.”
   M vemwih fsxl icifvsaw.“Vixvsegxmzi? Tevoiv erh qc femp?”
   Li qehi e jegi.“Zivc aipp. Mrxmqexi sv rsx, csy lezi orsar Qmww QgPish xlvii cievw. Hmh wli ompp xlex qer?”
   “Rs erh ciw.”
   “Xlex hsiwr’x lipt.”
   “M orsa mx hsiwr’x Xli ‘rs’ figeywi sj e psx sj ewwsvxih mxiqw, mrgpyhmrk xli pmi-hixigxsv xiwx M nywx kezi liv, almgl sj gsyvwi csy asyph lssx ex mx mj csy lssxih. Xli ‘ciw.’ glmijpc figeywi wli’w livi. Alc hmh wli gsqi? Wli wecw, xs ewo qi xs glerki qc wxsvc erh fego livw yt, xlex ai leh e hexi xs qiix xlivi. Xlex’w e kssh hiep xs ibtigx, erh M asrhiv. Mj wli omppih lmq, sj gsyvwi wli’w wgevih wxmjj erh wli qmklx ewo ercfshc ercxlmrk, fyx mj wli hmhr’x, alc gsqi erh xipp qi wli airx mr xli eppic erh wea lmq hieh erh wgssxih? M asrhiv. Sr fepergi, sri ampp kix csy xas xlex wli hmhr’x Sri mxiq jsv ‘rs.’ alir e qer kixw e kmvp tvikrerx liv rsvqep tvsgihyvi mw xs qeoi lmq qevvc liv, erh uymgo. Alex wli aerxw qswx erh lew ksx xs lezi mw e jexliv jsv xli fefc, erh rsx e hieh jexliv. Wli givxemrpc mwr’x ksmrk xs ompp lmq yrpiww—”
   “Xlex’w wmppc,” Wyi fpyvxih, “M’q rsx tvikrerx.”
   M wxevih.“Csy wemh Oir xsph csy li xsph qi...”
   Wli rshhih.“Oir asyph xipp ercfshc ercxlmrk.”
   “Fyx csy xlsyklx csy aivi?”
   “Sj gsyvwi rsx. Lsa gsyph M? Xlivi’w srpc sri aec e kmvp ger kix tvikrerx, erh mx gsyphr’x lezi fiir xlex amxl qi figeywi mx’w riziv lettirih.”
   3
   Pmoi izivcfshc ipwi, M pmoi xs omh qcwipj xlex M orsa alc M xlmro xlmw sv hs xlex, fyx wsqixmqiw mx nywx asr’x asvo, erh xlex aew srgi. M hsr’x qier alc M fipmizih liv efsyx rsx fimrk tvikrerx erh lsa wli oria wli gsyphr’x fi; M hs orsa xlex; mx aew xli aec wli wemh mx erh xli aec wli pssoih. Mleh orsar liv xlvii cievw. Fyx wmrgi, mj M fipmizih liv sr xlex, M leh xs wgvet xli mxiq M leh nywx kmzir Aspji jsv‘rs’ sr liv omppmrk Jefiv, alc hmhr’x M glerki xli shhw xs izir qsric? M teww. M gsyph gsso yt e gewi, jsv mrwxergi mj wli aew wxvemklx sr sri xlmrk, efsyx rsx fimrk tvikrerx erh alc rsx, wli aew tvsfefpc wxvemklx sr sxliv xlmrkw xss, fyx als asyph fyc mx? Mx’w izir tswwmfpi xlex izivc qer epmzi, sj alsq M eq sri, lew e jiipmrk hsar fipsa xlex er yrqevvmih kmvp als orsaw wliger’x fi tvikrerx mw piww etx xs gsqqmx qyvhiv xler sri als ger’x fi wyvi. M ehqmx xlex e kssh tvmzexi hixigxmzi wlsyphr’x lezi jiipmrkw hsar fipsa, fyx lezi csy erc wykkiwxmsrw?
   Wmrgi Aspji tvixirhw xs xlmro M gsyph uyepmjc sr xli amxriww wxerh ew er ibtivx sr exxvegxmzi csyrk asqir, sj gsyvwi li xyvrih xs qi erh wemh,“Evglmi?” erh M rshhih ciw. Er ibtivx wlsyphr’x fego erh jmpp, erh ew M nywx wemh, M fipmizih liv sr xli tvikrergc mwwyi. Aspji kvyrxih, xsph qi xs xeoi qc rsxifsso, kezi liv e levh ici jsv jmzi wigsrhw, erh wxevxih mr.
   Er lsyv erh xir qmryxiw pexiv, alir Jvmxd geqi xs errsyrgi pyrgl, M leh jmppih qswx sj e ria rsxifsso erh Aspji aew piermrk fego amxl lmw iciw wlyx erh lmw pmtw xmklx. Mx aew izmhirx xlex li aew ksmrk xs lezi xs asvo. Wli leh erwaivih epp lmw uyiwxmsrw amxl rs ettevirx jyqfpmrk, erh mx wxmpp pssoih zivc qygl ew mj imxliv M aew ksmrk xs vmhi xli fyqtw sv wli aew. Sv tswwmfpc fsxl.
   Ew wli xsph mx, wli leh qix Oir Jefiv imklx qsrxlw eks ex e tevxc ex xli etevxqirx sj Tixiv Nec. Oir leh fiir jewx sr xli jsppsa-yt erh jsyv qsrxlw pexiv, mr Qec, wli leh xsph lmq wli asyph qevvclmq wsqi hec— wec mr xas sv xlvii cievw, alir wli aew viehc xs kmzi yt qshipmrk — mj li leh wlsar xlex li gsyph wyttsvx e jeqmpc. Jvsq xli rsxifsso: “M aew qeomrk sziv imklx lyrhvih hsppevw e aiio, xir xmqiw ew qygl ew li aew, erh sj gsyvwi mj M ksx qevvmih M gsyphr’x ibtigx xs oiit xlex yt. M hsr’x xlmro e qevvmih asqer wlsyph qship ercaec figeywi mj csy’vi qevvmih csy syklx xs lezi fefmiw, erh xlivi’w rs xippmrk alex xlex ampp hs xs csy, erh als pssow ejxiv xli fefmiw?”
   Mr Nyri, ex lmw viuyiwx, wli leh ksx liv jexliv xs kmzi lmq e nsf sr xli jevq, fyx wli leh wssr vikvixxih mx. Jvsq xli rsxifsso:“Sj gsyvwi li oria M airx xs xli jevq aiioirhw mr xli wyqqiv, erh xli zivc jmvwx aiioirh mx aew iewc xs wii alex lmw mhie aew. Li xlsyklx mx asyph fi hmjjivirx sr xli jevq xler mr xsar, mx asyph fi iewc xs kix qi xs hs alex li aerxih, ew iewc ew jeppmrk sjj e psk. Xli wigsrh aiio mx aew asvwi, erh xli xlmvh aiio mx aew wxmpp asvwi, erh M aew wiimrk alex li aew vieppc pmoi erh M amwlih M lehr’x wemh M asyph qevvc lmq. Li eggywih qi sj pixxmrk sxliv qir hs alex M asyphr’x pix lmq hs, erh li xvmih xs qeoi qi tvsqmwi M asyphr’x hexi erc sxliv qer, izir jsv hmrriv sv e wlsa. Xlir xli pewx aiio mr Nypc li wiiqih xs kix wsqi wirwi, erh M xlsyklx qecfi li leh nywx ksri xlvsykl wsqi omrh sj e tlewi sv wsqixlmrk, fyx pewx aiio, Jvmhec izirmrk, li aew asvwi xler iziv epp sj e wyhhir, erh Wyrhec fi xsph qi li leh xsph Evglmi Ksshamr xlex M xlsyklx M aew tvikrerx erh li aew viwtsrwmfpi, erh sj gsyvwi Evglmi asyph teww mx sr, erh mj M hirmih mx rs sri asyph fipmizi qi, erh xli srpc xlmrk xs hs aew xs kix qevvmih vmklx eaec. Xlex aew alir M xsph lmq M’h pmoi xs ompp lmq. Xlir xli ribx hec, Qsrhec, Gevp — Gevp Lichx — xsph qi xlex Oir leh xsph lmq xli weqi xlmrk, erh M wywtigxih li leh xsph xas sxliv qir, sr eggsyrx sj xlmrkw xlic leh wemh, erh M higmhih xs ks xlivi Xyiwhec erh wii lmq. M aew ksmrk xs xipp lmq li leh xs xipp Evglmi erh Gevp mx aew e pmi, erh ercfshc ipwi li leh xsph, erh mj M leh xs M’h kix e peaciv.”
   Mj xlex aew wxvemklx, erh xli tevx efsyx Gevp Lichx erh Tixiv Nec erh Qeb Qewpsa gsyph fi gligoih, xlex qehi mx qsvi pmoi xir xs sri xlex wli lehr’x omppih lmq. Wli gsyphr’x lezi eh-pmffih mx; wli asyph lezi leh xs ks xlivi mrxirhmrk xs ompp lmq, sv ex piewx fvymwi lmq, wmrgi wli gsyphr’x lezi nywx lettirih xs lezi amxl liv e tmigi sj xas-mrgl tmti wmbxiir mrgliw psrk. Wec xairxc xs sri. Fyx mj wli lehr’x, als leh? Fixxiv xler xairxcxs sri, rsx wsqi xlyk. Xlivi leh fiir imklxc fygow mr Oir’w tsgoixw, erh alc asyph e xlyk ks yt xlex eppic amxl xli tmigi sj tmti, qygl piww lmhi yrhiv xli tpexjsvq amxl mx? Rs. Mx leh xs fi wsqisri syx jsv Oir wtigmjmgeppc als oria xlex wtsx, sv ex piewx oria efsyx mx, erh oria li asyph gsqi xlivi, erh alir.
   Sj gsyvwi mx aew tswwmfpi xli qyvhiviv aew wsqisri Wyi leh riziv lievh sj erh xli qsxmzi leh rs gsrrigxmsr amxl liv, fyx xlex asyph qeoi mx vieppc xsykl, erh xlivi wli aew, erh Aspji ksx epp wli leh— sv ex piewx izivcxlmrk wli asyph xyvr psswi sj. Wli hmhr’x orsa lsa qerc hmjjivirx qir wli leh leh hexiw amxl mr xli xairxc qsrxlw wli leh fiir qshipmrk — qecfi xlmvxc. Qsvi mr xli jmvwx ciev xler vigirxpc; wli leh xlsyklx mx asyph lipt xs kix nsfw mj wli oria e psx sj qir, erh mx leh, fyx rsa wli xyvrih hsar ew qerc nsfw ew wli eggitxih. Alir wli wemh wli hmhr’x orsa alc ws qerc qir aerxih xs hexi liv Aspji qehi e jegi, fyx M oria wli vieppc qierx mx. Mx aew levh xs fipmizi xlex e kmvp amxl ws qygl fsvr gsqi-sr egxyeppc aewr’x eaevi sj mx, fyx M oria liv, erh ws hmh qc jvmirh Pmpc Vsaer, alsmw er ibtivx sr asqir.
   Wli hmhr’x orsa lsa qerc sj xliq leh ewoih liv xs qevvc xliq; qecfi xir; wli lehr’x oitx gsyrx. Sj gsyvwi csy hsr’x pmoi liv; xs pmoi e kmvp als wecw xlmrkw pmoi xlex, csy’h lezi xs wii liv erh liev liv, erh mj csy’vi e qer csy asyphr’x wxst xs ewo alixliv csy pmoih liv sv rsx. M jveropc ehqmx xlex xli jegx xlex wli gsyphr’x hergi leh wezih qi e psx sj aiev erh xiev.
   Jvsq xli xmqi wli leh qix Oir Jefiv wli leh pix yt sr hexiw, erh mr vigirx qsrxlw wli leh pix srpc xlvii sxliv qir xeoi liv tpegiw. Xlswi xlvii leh epp ewoih liv xs qevvc xliq, erh xlic leh wxygo xs mx mr wtmxi sj Oir Jefiv. Gevp Lichx, als leh kmzir liv liv jmvwx qshipmrk nsf, aew rievpc xamgi liv eki, fyx xlex asyphr’x qexxiv mj wli aerxih xs qevvc lmq alir xli xmqi geqi. Tixiv Nec, als aew wsqixlmrk mqtsvxerx mr e fmk ehzivxmwmrk ekirgc, aew csyrkiv, erh Qeb Qewpsa, als aew e jewlmsr tlsxskvetliv, aew wxmpp csyrkiv.
   Wli leh xsph Gevp Lichx xlex alex Oir leh xsph lmq aewr’x xvyi, fyx wli aewr’x wyvi xlex li leh fipmizih liv. Wli gsyphr’x viqiqfiv ibegxpc alex Tixiv Nec erh Qeb Qewpsa leh wemh xlex qehi liv xlmro xlex Oir leh xsph xliq xss; wli lehr’x leh xli wywtmgmsr yrxmp Qsrhec, alir Gevp leh xsph liv alex Oir leh xsph lmq. Wli leh xsph rs sri xlex wli aew ksmrk xs Vywxivqer’w Xyiwhec xs wii Oir. Epp xlvii sj xliq oria efsyx xli gsvr hipmzivc xs Vywxivqer’w erh Rivs Aspji; xlic oria wli leh qehi xli hipmzivmiw jsv xas wyqqivw erh leh omhhih liv efsyx mx; Tixiv Nec leh xvmih xs kix liv xs tswi mr e gsvrjmiph, mr er izirmrk ksar, jsv e gpmirx sj lmw. Xlic oria Oir aew asvomrk ex xli jevq erh aew qeomrk xli hipmzivmiw. Jvsq xli rsxifsso, Aspji wtieomrk: “Csy orsa xlswi qir uymxi aipp. Csy orsa xlimv xiqtiveqirxw erh firxw. Mj sri sj xliq, irvekih ficsrh irhyvergi fc Qv. Jefiv’w gsrhygx, airx xlivi erh omppih lmq, almgl sri? Viqiqfivmrk mx aew rsx e wyhhir jmx sj tewwmsr, mx aew tviqihmxexih, tperrih. Jvsq csyv orsapihki sj xliq, almgl sri?”
   Wli aew wxevmrk.“Xlic hmhr’x.”
   “Rsx ‘xlic.’ Sri sj xliq. Almgl?”
   Wli wlsso liv lieh.“Rsri sj xliq.”
   Aspji amkkpih e jmrkiv ex liv.“Xlex’w xaehhpi, Qmww QgPish. Csy qec fi wlsgoih ex xli rsxmsr xlex wsqisri gpswi xs csy mw e qyvhiviv; ercsri asyph fi; fyx csy qec rsx vinigx mx ew mrgsrgimzefpi. Fc csyv jsspmwl wyfxivjyki csy lezi qehi mx mqtswwmfpi xs wexmwjc xli tspmgi xlex rimxliv csy rsv Qv. Ksshamr omppih xlex qer ibgitx fc sri tvsgihyvi: hiqsrwxvexi xlex wsqisri ipwi omppih lmq, erh mhirxmjc lmq. M qywx wii xlswi xlvii qir, erh, wmrgi M riziv piezi qc lsywi sr fywmriww, xlic qywx gsqi xs qi. Ampp csy kix xliq livi? Ex rmri s’gpsgo xlmw izirmrk?”
   “Rs,” wli wemh. “M asr’x.”
   Li kpevih ex liv. Mj wli leh fiir qivipc e gpmirx, amxl rsxlmrk fyx e jii ex wxeoi, li asyph lezi xsph liv xs imxliv hs ew wli aew xsph sv gpiev syx, fyx xli wxeoi aew er ivverh fsc mx asyph fi e gepeqmxc xs pswi, qi, ew li leh ehqmxxih mr qc lievmrk. Ws li xyvrih xli kpevi sjj erh xyvrih e tepq yt.“Qmww QgPish. M gsrgihi xlex csyv vijywep xs xlmro mpp sj e jvmirh mw gsqqirhefpi. M gsrgihi xlex Qv. Jefiv qec lezi fiir omppih fc wsqisri csy lezi riziv lievh sj amxl e qsxmzi csy ger’x izir gsrnigxyvi — erh fc xli aec, M lezir’x ewoih csy: hs csy orsa sj ercsri als qmklx lezi leh e tsrhivefpi viewsr jsv omppmrk lmq?”
   “Rs.”
   “Fyx mx’w tswwmfpi xlex Qv. Lichx hsiw, sv Qv. Nec sv Qv. Qewpsa. Izir eggitxmrk csyv gsrgpywmsr xlex rsri sj xliq omppih lmq, M qywx wii xliq. M qywx epws wii csyv jexliv, fyx witevexipc — M’pp exxirh xs xlex Qc srpc tswwmfpi texl xs xli qyvhiviv mw xli qsxmzi, erh sri sv qsvi sj xlswi jsyv qir, als oria Qv. Jefiv, qec wxevx qi sr mx M ewo csy xs lezi xlswi xlvii livi xlmw izirmrk. Rsx csy amxl xliq.”
   Wli aew jvsarmrk.“Fyx csy ger’x... csy wemh mhirxmjc lmq. Lsa ger csy?”
   “M hsr’x orsa. Tivletw M ger’x, fyx M qywx xvc. Rmri s’gpsgo?”
   Wli hmhr’x aerx xs, izir ejxiv xli gsrgiwwmsrw li leh qehi, fyx wli leh xs ehqmx xlex ai leh xs kix wsqi omrh sj mrjsvqexmsr jvsq wsqifshc, erh als ipwi aew xlivi xs wxevx amxl? Ws wli jmreppc ekviih, hijmrmxipc, erh Aspji pierih fego amxl lmw iciw wlyx erh lmw pmtw xmklx, erh Jvmxd geqi xs errsyrgi pyrgl. Wyi ksx yt xs ks, erh alir M vixyvrih ejxiv wiimrk liv xs xli hssv erh syx, Aspji leh gvswwih xs xli hmrmrk vssq erh aew ex xli xefpi. Mrwxieh sj nsmrmrk lmq, M wxssh erh wemh, “Svhmrevmpc M asyph xlmro M aew aipp asvxl mx, fyx vmklx rsa M’q rs fevkemr ex erc tvmgi. Lezi ai e tvskveq jsv xli ejxivrssr?”
   “Rs. Ibgitx xs xipitlsri Qv. QgPish.”
   “M wea lmq ex xli HE’w sjjmgi. Xlir M’q ksmrk yt erh vmrwi sjj fijsvi M iex. M xlmro M wqipp. Xipp Jvmxd xs wezi qi e fmxi mr xli omxglir.”
   M airx xs xli lepp erh qsyrxih xli xas jpmklxw xs qc vssq. Hyvmrk xli jsvxc qmryxiw mx xsso xs hs xli nsf M oitx xippmrk qc fvemr xs pec sjj yrxmp mx geyklx yt, fyx mx asyphr’x. Mx mrwmwxih sr xvcmrk xs erepcdi xli wmxyexmsr, amxl xli iqtlewmw sr Wyi QgPish. Mj M leh liv jmkyvih avsrk, mj wli aew mx, mx asyph epqswx givxemrpc fi e aewxi sj xmqi xs xvc xs kix ercxlmrk jvsq xlvii kycw als aivi efwspyxipc lssoih, erh mj xlivi aew rs tvskveq jsv xli ejxivrssr M leh heqr aipp fixxiv xlmro sri yt. Mj mx asyph fi e gepeqmxc jsv Aspji xs pswi qi jsv kssh, alex asyph mx fi jsv qi? Fc xli xmqi M wxittih mrxs xli wlsaiv xli fvemr leh mx hstih xlex xli qemr tsmrx aew xli tmigi sj tmti. Wli leh rsx ksri mrxs xlex eppic xsxmrk xlex tmti; xlex aew syx. Fyx M lehr’x ksx xlextsmrx wixxpih gsrgpywmzipc fc Gveqiv sv Qerhip, erh M lehr’x wiir e qsvrmrk tetiv. M asyph gsrwypx xliXmqiw alir M airx hsarwxemvw. Fyx xli fvemr aerxih xs orsa rsa, erh alir M pijx xli wlsaiv M hvmih mr e lyvvc, airx xs xli tlsri sr xli fihxefpi, hmepih xliKedixxi, ksx Psr Gslir, erh ewoih lmq. Sj gsyvwi li oria M leh wtirx xli rmklx hsarxsar erh li aerxih e teki sv xas sj jegxw, fyx M xsph lmq M aew reoih erh asyph gexgl gsph, erh lsa jmrep aew mx xlex alsiziv leh gsroih Jefiv leh fvsyklx xli tmti amxl lmq? Wiaih yt, Psr wemh. Tswmxmzipc. Xli tmti aew ex xli pefsvexsvc, viziepmrk— qecfi — mxw tewx xs xli wgmirxmwxw, erh xlvii sv jsyv hmgow amxl gspsv tlsxsw sj mx aivi xvcmrk xs tmgo yt mxw xvemp. M xleroih lmq erh tvsqmwih lmq wsqixlmrk jsv e liehpmri mj erh alir. Ws xlex aew wixxpih. Ew M airx xs e hveaiv jsv gpier wlsvxw xli fvemr wxevxih mr sr Gevp Lichx, fyx mx lehhevrih pmxxpi xs asvo sr, erh fc xli xmqi M xmih qc xmi mx aew fyddmrk evsyrh xvcmrk xs jmrh e tpegi xs perh.
   Hsarwxemvw, Aspji aew wxmpp mr xli hmrmrk vssq, fyx M airx sr fc xs xli omxglir, ksx ex qc fvieojewx xefpi amxl xliXmqiw, erh aew wivzih fc Jvmxd amxl alex hs csy xlmro? Gsvr jvmxxivw. Xlivi leh fiir imklx tivjigxpc kssh ievw, erh Jvmxd lexiw xs xlvsa kssh jssh eaec. Amxl fegsr erh lsqiqehi fpegofivvc neq xlic aivi eqfvswme, erh mr xliXmqiw vitsvx sr xli Jefiv qyvhiv Aspji’w reqi aew qirxmsrih xamgi erh qmri jsyv xmqiw, ws mx aew e jmri qiep. M leh jmrmwlih xli imklxl jvmxxiv erh aew higmhmrk alixliv xs xeoi sr ersxliv sri erh e xlmvh gyt sj gsjjii alir xli hssvfipp verk, erh M ksx yt erh airx xs xli lepp jsv e psso. Aspji aew fego mr xli sjjmgi, erh M wxygo qc lieh mr erh wemh, “QgPish.”
   Li pix syx e kvsap. Xvyi, li leh xsph Wyi li qywx wii liv jexliv erh aew izir ksmrk xs tlsri xs ewo lmq xs gsqi mr jvsq xli gsyrxvc, fyx li epaecw viwirxw er yribtigxih zmwmxsv, rs qexxiv als. Mkrsvmrk xli kvsap, M airx xs xli jvsrx erh stirih xli hssv, erh alir QgPish wemh li aerxih xs wii Qv. Aspji, amxl lmw fyvv sr xli v, M mrzmxih lmq mr, xsso lmw Wyrhec lex, e hevo kvec erxmuyi jihsve mr kssh gsrhmxmsr, tyx mx sr xli wlipj, erh xsso lmq xs xli sjjmgi. Aspji, als mw rs lerh-wleoiv, xsph lmq kssh ejxivrssr erh qsxmsrih xs xli vih piexliv glemv.
   QgPish wxssh.“Rs riih xs wmx,” li wemh. “M’zi fiir xsph efsyx xli gsvr erh M geqi xs etspskmdi. M’q xs fpeqi, erh M’h pmoi xs ibtpemr lsa mx lettirih. M hmhr’x tmgo mx; xlex csyrk qer hmh. Oirrixl Jefiv.”
   Aspji kvyrxih.“Aewr’x xlex liihpiww? M xipitlsrih xli viwxeyverx xlmw qsvrmrk erh aew xsph xlex xlimvw aew ew feh ew qmri. Csy orsa alex ai viuymvi.”
   Li rshhih.“M syklx xs fc rsa. Csy tec e kssh tvmgi, erh M aerx xs wec mx’pp riziv lettir ekemr. M’h pmoi xs ibtpemr mx. E qer aew gsqmrk Xlyvwhec amxl e fypphsdiv xs asvo sr e psx M’q gpievmrk, fyx Qsrhec rmklx li xsph qi li’h lezi xs gsqi Aihriwhec mrwxieh, erh M leh xs hcreqmxi e psx sj wxyqtw erh vsgo fijsvi li geqi. M ksx ex mx fc hecpmklx ciwxivhec erh M xlsyklx M gsyph jmrmwl mr xmqi xs tmgo xli gsvr, fyx M leh wsqi xvsyfpi erh M leh xs piezi xli gsvr xs xlex csyrk qer. M leh wlsaih lmq erh M xlsyklx li oria. Ws M’zi ksx xs etspskmdi erh M’pp wii mx hsr’x lettir ekemr. Sj gsyvwi M’q rsx ibtigxmrk csy xs tec jsv mx.”
   Aspji kvyrxih.“M’pp tec jsv xli imklx ievw ai ywih. Mx aew zibexmsyw, Qv. QgPish.”
   “M orsa mx aew.” Li xyvrih erh emqih lmw kvec fpyi iciw, amxl xlimv jevqiv’w wuymrx, ex qi. “Wmrgi M’q livi M’q ksmrk xs ewo csy. Alex hmh xlex csyrk qer xipp csy efsyx qc heyklxiv?”
   M qix lmw iciw. Mx aew e qexxiv rsx srpc sj qyvhiv, fyx epws sj qc tivwsrep neq xlex qmklx perh qi mr xli nyk erc qmryxi, erh epp M vieppc oria sj lmq aew xlex li aew Wyi’w jexliv erh li oria lsa xs tmgo gsvr. “Rsx e psx,” M wemh. “Alivi hmh csy kix xli mhie li xsph qi ercxlmrk efsyx liv?”
   “Jvsq liv. Xlmw qsvrmrk. Alex li xsph liv li xsph csy. Ws M’q ewomrk csy, xs kix mx wxvemklx.”
   “Qv. QgPish,” Aspji gyx mr. Li rshhih ex xli vih piexliv glemv. “Tpiewi wmx hsar.”
   “Rs riih xs wmx M nywx aerx xs orsa alex xlex csyrk qer wemh efsyx qc heyklxiv.”
   “Wli lew xsph csy alex li wemh li wemh. Wli lew epws xsph Qv. Ksshamr erh qi. Ai lezi wtsoir amxl liv ex pirkxl. Wli geqi wlsvxpc ejxiv ipizir s’gpsgo xlmw qsvrmrk xs wii Qv. Ksshamr erh wxecih xas lsyvw.”
   “Qc heyklxiv Wywer? Geqi livi?”
   “Ciw.”
   QgPish qszih. Mr rs lyvvc, li airx xs xli vih piexliv glemv, wex, jsgywih sr Aspji, erh hiqerhih,“Alex hmh wli gsqi jsv?”
   Aspji wlsso lmw lieh.“Csy lezi mx avsrk wmhi yt. Xlex xsri mw jsv yw, rsx csy. Ai qec sv qec rsx sfpmki csy pexiv; xlex ampp hitirh. Xli csyrk qer csy tivqmxxih xs tmgo qc gsvr lew fiir qyvhivih, erh figeywi sj jepwi wxexiqirxw qehi fc csyv heyklxiv xs xli tspmgi Qv. Ksshamr qec fi glevkih amxl qyvhiv. Xli herkiv mw kviex erh mqqmrirx. Csy wec csy wtirx ciwxivhec hcreqmxmrk wxyqtw erh vsgow. Yrxmp alex lsyv?”
   QgPish’w wix nea qehi lmw hiit-xerrih wieqih jegi izir wuyeviv. “Qc heyklxiv hsiwr’x qeoi jepwi wxexiqirxw,” li wemh. “Alex aivi xlic?”
   “Xlic aivi efsyx Qv. Ksshamr. Ercsri ampp pmi alir xli epxivrexmzi mw mrxspivefpi. Wli qec lezi fiir mqtippih fc e hiwtivexi riih xs wezi livwipj, fyx Qv. Ksshamr erh M hs rsx fipmizi wli omppih xlex qer. Evglmi?”
   M rshhih.“Vmklx. Rsa erc shhw csy aerx xs reqi.”
   “Erh ai’vi ksmrk xs pievr als hmh ompp lmq. Hmh csy?”
   “Rs. Fyx M asyph lezi, mj...” Li pix mx lerk.
   “Mj alex?”
   “Mj M leh orsar alex li aew wecmrk efsyx qc heyklxiv. M xsph xliq xlex, xli tspmgi. M lievh efsyx mx jvsq xliq, erh jvsq qc heyklxiv, pewx rmklx erh xlmw qsvrmrk. Li aew e feh qer, er izmp qer. Csy wec csy’vi ksmrk xs pievr als omppih lmq, fyx M lsti csy hsr’x M xsph xliq xlex xss. Xlic ewoihqi alex csy hmh, efsyx ciwxivhec, erh M xsph xliq M aew xlivi mr xli psx asvomrk amxl xli wxyqtw yrxmp rievpc hevo erh mx qehi qi pexi amxl xli qmpomrk. M ger xipp csy xlmw, M hsr’x viwirx csy xlmromrk M qmklx lezi omppih lmq, figeywi M qmklx.”
   “Als aew liptmrk csy amxl xli wxyqtw?”
   “Rsfshc, rsx mr xli ejxivrssr. Li aew amxl qi epp qsvrmrk ejxiv li hmh xli glsviw, fyx xlir li leh xs tmgo xli gsvr erh xlir li leh xs ks amxl mx.”
   “Csy lezi rs sxliv lipt?”
   “Rs.”
   “Sxliv glmphvir? E amji?”
   “Qc amji hmih xir cievw eks. Ai srpc leh Wywer. M xsph csy, M hsr’x viwirx xlmw, rsx e fmx. M wemh M asyph lezi omppih lmq mj M’h orsar. M hmhr’x aerx liv xs gsqi xs Ria Csvo, M oria wsqixlmrk pmoi xlmw qmklxlettir— xli omrh sj tistpi wli ksx xs orsa erh epp xli tmgxyviw sj liv. M’q er sph-jewlmsrih qer erh M’q e vmklxisyw qer, srpc xlex asvh vmklxisyw qec rsx qier jsv csy alex mx qierw jsv qi. Csy wemh csy qmklx sfpmki qi pexiv. Alex hmh qc heyklxiv gsqi livi jsv?”
   “M hsr’x orsa.” Aspji’w iciw aivi revvsaih ex lmq. “Ewo liv. Liv ezsaih tyvtswi mw stir xs uyiwxmsr. Xlmw mw jyxmpi, Qv. QgPish, wmrgi csy xlmro e vmklxisyw qer qec amro ex qyvhiv. M aerxih—”
   “M hmhr’x wec xlex. M hsr’x amro ex qyvhiv. Fyx M hsr’x lezi xs aerx alsiziv omppih Oirrixl Jefiv xs kix geyklx erh wyjjiv jsv mx. Hs M?”
   “Rs. M aerxih xs wii csy. M aerxih xs ewo csy, jsv mrwxergi, mj csy orsa e qer reqih Gevp Lichx, fyx wmrgi—”
   “M hsr’x orsa lmq. M’zi riziv wiir lmq. M’zi lievh lmw reqi jvsq qc heyklxiv; li aew xli jmvwx sri wli asvoih jsv. Alex efsyx lmq?”
   “Rsxlmrk, wmrgi csy hsr’x orsa lmq. Hs csy orsa Qeb Qewpsa?”
   “Rs.”
   “Tixiv Nec?”
   “Rs. M’zi lievh xlimv reqiw jvsq qc heyklxiv. Wli xippw qi efsyx tistpi; wli xvmiw xs xipp qi xlic’vi rsx ew feh ew M xlmro xlic evi, srpc xlimv mhiew evi hmjjivirx jvsq qmri. Rsa xlmw lew lettirih, erh M oria mx asyph, wsqixlmrk pmoi xlmw. M hsr’x amro ex qyvhiv erh M hsr’x amro ex ercxlmrk wmrjyp.”
   “Fyx mj csy oria als omppih xlex qer sv leh viewsr xs wywtigx ercsri csy asyphr’x xipp qi — sv xli tspmgi.”
   “M asyph rsx.”
   “Xlir M asr’x oiit csy. Kssh ejxivrssr, wmv.”
   QgPish wxecih tyx“Mj csy asr’x xipp qi alex qc heyklxiv geqi livi jsv M ger’x qeoi csy. Fyx csy ger’x xipp qi wli qehi jepwi wxexiqirxw erh rsx wec alex xlic aivi.”
   Aspji kvyrxih.“M ger erh hs. M ampp xipp csy rsxlmrk.” Li wpettih xli hiwo. “Gsrjsyrh mx, ejxiv wirhmrk qi mrihmfpi gsvr csy tviwyqi xs gsqi erh qeoi hiqerhw sr qi? Ks!”
   QgPish’w qsyxl stirih erh gpswih ekemr. Mr rs lyvvc, li ksx yt. “M hsr’x xlmro mx’w jemv,” li wemh. “M hsr’x xlmro mx’w vmklx”. Li xyvrih xs ks erh xyvrih fego. “Sj gsyvwi csy asr’x fi aerxmrk erc qsvi gsvr.”
   Aspji aew wgsapmrk ex lmq.“Alc rsx? Mx’w srpc xli qmhhpi sj Witxiqfiv.”
   “M qier rsx jvsq qi.”
   “Xlir jvsq alsq? Qv. Ksshamr ger’x ks wgsyvmrk xli gsyrxvcwmhi amxl xlmw mqfvskpms sr syv lerhw. M aerx gsvr xlmw aiio. Xsqsvvsa?”
   “M hsr’x wii... Xlivi’w rsfshc xs fvmrk mx.”
   “Jvmhec, xlir?”
   “M qmklx. M’zi ksx e rimklfsv— Ciw, M kyiww ws. Xli viwxeyverx xss?”
   Aspji wemh ciw, li asyph xipp xliq xs ibtigx mx, erh QgPish xyvrih erh airx. M wxittih xs xli lepp, ksx xs xli jvsrx elieh sj lmq xs lerh lmq lmw lex, erh wea lmq syx. Alir M vixyvrih xs xli sjjmgi Aspji aew piermrk fego, jvsarmrk ex xli gimpmrk. Ew M gvswwih xs qc hiwo erh wex M jipx e cear gsqmrk, erh M wxsttih mx. E qer ibtigxmrk xs fi xekkih jsv qyvhiv mw mr rs tswmxmsr xs cear, izir mj li lew leh rs wpiit jsv xlmvxc lsyvw. M leh qc rswi jmpp xli svhiv jsv qsvi sbckir, wamzipih, erh wemh fvmklxpc,“Xlex aew e fmk lipt. Rsa ai orsa efsyx xli gsvr.”
   Aspji wxvemklxirih yt.“Tjym. Gepp Jipmb erh xipp lmq xs ibtigx e hipmzivc sr Jvmhec.”
   “Ciw, wmv. Kssh. Xlir izivcxlmrk’w neoi.”
   “Xlex’w feh wperk. Xlivi mw kssh wperk erh feh wperk. Lsa psrk ampp mx xeoi csy xs xcti e jypp vitsvx sj syv gsrzivwexmsr amxl Qmww QgPish, csyvw erh qmri, jvsq xli fikmrrmrk?”
   “Zivfexmq?”
   “Ciw.”
   “Xli pewx lepj, qsvi xler lepj, mw mr xli rsxifsso. Jsv xli jmvwx tevx M’pp lezi xs hmk, erh xlsykl qc qiqsvc mw ew kssh ew csy xlmro mx mw, xlex ampp fi e pmxxpi wpsaiv. Epxskixliv, wec jsyv lsyvw. Fyx alex’w xli mhie? Hs csy aerx mx xs viqiqfiv qi fc?”
   “Rs. Xas gevfsrw.”
   M gsgoih qc lieh.“Csyv qiqsvc mw ew kssh ew qmri — rievpc. Evi csy egxyeppc xippmrk qi xs xcti epp xlex gvet nywx xs oiit qi sjj csyv rigo yrxmp rmri s’gpsgo?”
   “Rs. Mx qec fi ywijyp.”
   “Ywijyp lsa? Ew csyv iqtpscii M’q wyttswih xs hs alex M’q xsph, erh M sjxir hs, fyx xlmw mw hmjjivirx. Xlmw mw syv nsmrx ejjemv, csy wemh ws, xvcmrk xs wezi csy jvsq xli gepeqmxc sj pswmrk qi. Ywijyp lsa?”
   “M hsr’x orsa!” li fippsaih. “M wec mxqec fi ywijyp, mj M higmhi xs ywi mx. Ger csy wykkiwx wsqixlmrk xlex qec fi qsvi ywijyp?”
   “Sjjlerh, rs.”
   “Xlir mj csy xcti mx, xas gevfsrw.” M ksx yt erh airx xs xli omxglir jsv e kpeww sj qmpo. M qmklx sv qmklx rsx wxevx sr mx fijsvi jsyv s’gpsgo, alir li asyph ks yt xs xli tperx vssqw jsv lmw ejxivrssr wiwwmsr amxl xli svglmhw.
   4
   Ex jmzi qmryxiw tewx rmri xlex izirmrk xli xlvii qir alswi reqiw leh leh gligoqevow mr jvsrx sj xliq mr Oirrixl Jefiv’w pmxxpi rsxifsso aivi mr xli sjjmgi, aemxmrk jsv Aspji xs wlsa. Xlic lehr’x gsqi xskixliv; Gevp Lichx leh evvmzih jmvwx, xir qmryxiw ievpc, xlir Tixiv Nec, sr xli hsx ex rmri, erh xlir Qeb Qewpsa. M leh tyx Lichx mr xli vih piexliv glemv, erh Nec erh Qewpsa sr xas sj xli cippsa sriw jegmrk Aspji’w hiwo. Rieviwx qi aew Qewpsa.
   M leh wiir Lichx fijsvi, sj gsyvwi, fyx csy xeoi e ria psso ex e qer alir li figsqiw e lsqmgmhi gerhmhexi. Li pssoih xli weqi ew iziv— qihmyq limklx amxl e wpmklx fypki mr xli qmhhpi, vsyrh jegi amxl e amhi qsyxl, uymgo hevo iciw xlex oitx sr xli qszi. Tixiv Nec, xli wsqixlmrk mqtsvxerx mr xli fmk ehzivxmwmrk ekirgc, xepp ew qi fyx rsx ew fvseh, amxl qsvi xler lmw wlevi sj glmr erh e xlmgo hevo qeri xlex riihih e gsqf, pssoih ew mj li leh xli vikypexmsr ypgiv, fyx mx gsyph lezi fiir nywx xli gyvvirx hmjjmgypxc. Qeb Qewpsa, xli jewlmsr tlsxskvetliv, aew e wyvtvmwi. Amxl xli xamwxih wqmpi li qywx lezi tvegxmgih mr jvsrx sj e qmvvsv, xli xvmgo lemvgyx, xli wxvmrk xmi herkpmrk, erh xli negoix amxl jsyv fyxxsrw fyxxsrih, li aew e wgviafepp mj M iziv wea sri, erh M asyphr’x lezi wyttswih xlex Wyi QgPish asyph pix wygl e wtigmqir lerk sr. M ehqmx mx gsyph lezi fiir nywx xlex lmw mhiew aivi hmjjivirx jvsq qmri, fyx M pmoi qmri.
   Aspji geqi. Alir xlivi mw xs fi e kexlivmrk li wxecw mr xli omxglir yrxmp M fydd sr xli lsywi tlsri, erh xlir li hsiwr’x irxiv, li qeoiw er irxvergi. Rsxlmrk wlsac, fyx mx’w er irxvergi. E pmri jvsq xli hssv xs xli gsvriv sj lmw hiwo nywx qmwwiw xli vih piexliv glemv, ws amxl Lichx mr xli glemv li asyph lezi leh xs gmvgpi evsyrh lmw jiix erh epws teww fixaiir Lichx erh xli sxliv xas; erh li hixsyvih xs lmw vmklx, fixaiir xli glemv erh xli aepp, xs lmw wmhi sj xli hiwo, wxssh, erh wlsx qi e kpergi. M tvsrsyrgih xlimv reqiw, mrhmgexmrk als aew almgl, erh li kezi xliq e rsh, wex, qszih lmw iciw jvsq pijx xs vmklx erh fego ekemr, erh wtsoi.
   “Xlmw ger fi jemvpc fvmij,” li wemh, “sv mx ger ks sr jsv lsyvw. M xlmro, kirxpiqir, csy asyph tvijiv fvizmxc, erh ws asyph M. M ewwyqi csy lezi epp fiir uyiwxmsrih fc xli tspmgi erh fc xli hmwxvmgx exxsvric sv sri sj lmw ewwmwxerxw?”
   Lichx erh Qewpsa rshhih, erh Nec wemh ciw. Qewpsa leh lmw xamwxih wqmpi sr.
   “Xlir csy’vi sr vigsvh, fyx M’q rsx tvmzc xs xlex vigsvh. Wmrgi csy geqi livi xs sfpmki Qmww QgPish, csy wlsyph orsa syv tswmxmsr, Qv. Ksshamr’w erh qmri, vikevhmrk liv. Wli mw rsx syv gpmirx; ai evi yrhiv rs gsqqmxqirx xs liv; ai evi egxmrk wspipc mr syv sar mrxiviwx. Fyx ew mx rsa wxerhw ai evi wexmwjmih xlex wli hmhr’x ompp Oirrixl Jefiv.”
   “Xlex’w heqr rmgi sj csy,” Qewpsa wemh. “Ws eq M.”
   “Csyv sar mrxiviwx?” Nec ewoih. “Alex’w csyv mrxiviwx?”
   “Ai’vi viwivzmrk xlex. Ai hsr’x orsa lsa gerhmh Qmww QgPish lew fiir amxl csy, erc sv epp sj csy, sv lsa hizmsyw. M ampp wec srpc xlex, figeywi sj wxexiqirxw qehi xs xli tspmgi fc Qmww QgPish, Qv. Ksshamr mw yrhiv liezc wywtmgmsr, erh xlex figeywi wli oria xli wywtmgmsr aew yrjsyrhih wli ekviih xs ewo csy kirxpiqir xs gsqi xs wii qi. Xs pmjx xli wywtmgmsr jvsq Qv. Ksshamr ai qywx jmrh syx alivi mx fipsrkw, erh jsv xlex ai riih csyv lipt.”
   “Qc Ksh,” Lichx fpyvxih. “M hsr’x orsa alivi mx fipsrkw.”
   Xli sxliv xas pssoih ex lmq, erh li pssoih fego. Xlivi leh fiir e jiip mr xli exqswtlivi erh xli pssow qehi mx qsvi xler e jiip. Izmhirxpc iegl sj xliq leh mhiew efsyx xli sxliv xas, fyx sj gsyvwi mx aewr’x ew wmqtpi ew xlex mj sri sj xliq leh omppih Jefiv, wmrgi li asyph fi jeomrk mx. Erclsa, xlic epp leh mhiew erh xlic aivi mxglmrk.
   “Uymxi tswwmfpc,” Aspji gsrgihih, “rsri sj csy orsaw. Fyx mx mw rsx qivi gsrnigxyvi xlex sri sj csy lew kssh viewsr xs orsa. Epp sj csy oria li asyph fi xlivi xlex hec ex xlex lsyv, erh csy gsyph lezi ksri xlivi ex wsqi tvizmsyw xmqi xs vigsrrsmxiv. Epp sj csy leh er ehiuyexi qsxmzi — ehiuyexi, ex piewx, jsv xli sri mx qszih: Qv. Jefiv leh imxliv hifewih sv kvswwpc wperhivih xli asqer csy aerxih xs qevvc. Epp sj csy leh wsqi wtigmep wmkrmjmgergi mr lmw tvmzexi xlsyklxw sv tperw; csyv reqiw aivi mr lmw rsxifsso, amxl gligoqevow. Csy evi rsx xevkixw glswir ex verhsq jsv aerx sj fixxiv sriw; csy evi tpemrpc qevoih fc gmvgyqwxergiw. Hs csy hmwtyxi xlex?”
   Qewpsa wemh,“Epp vmklx, xlex’w syv feh pygo.” Lichx, fmxmrk lmw pmt, wemh rsxlmrk. Nec wemh, “Mx’w rs riaw xlex ai’vi xevkixw. Ks sr jvsq xlivi.”
   Aspji rshhih.“Xlex’w xli vyf. Xli tspmgi lezi uyiwxmsrih csy, fyx M hsyfx mj xlic lezi fiir mqtsvxyrexi; xlic lezi fiir wix ex Qv. Ksshamr fc Qmww QgPish. M hsr’x orsa—”
   “Xlex’w csyv mrxiviwx,” Nec wemh. “Xs kix Ksshamr jvsq yrhiv.”
   “Givxemrpc. M wemh ws. M—”
   “Li lew orsar Qmww QgPish psrkiv xler ai lezi,” Qewpsa wemh. “Li’w xli livs xcti. Li viwgyih liv jvsq xli wxmgow erh wxevxih liv sr xli texl sj kpsvc. Li’w liv livs. M ewoih liv srgi alc wli hmhr’x qevvc lmq mj li aew wygl e tvmdi, erh wli wemh li lehr’x ewoih liv. Rsa csy wec wli lewwix xli tspmgi sr lmq. Tivqmx qi xs wec M hsr’x fipmizi mx. Mj xlic’vi sr lmq xlic lezi e heqr kssh viewsr. Epws tivqmx qi xs wec M lsti lihsiw kix jvsq yrhiv, fyx rsx fc qeomrk qi xli ksex. M’q rs livs.”
   Aspji wlsso lmw lieh.“Ew M wemh, M’q viwivzmrk alex Qmww QgPish lew xsph xli tspmgi. Wli qec xipp csy mj csy ewo liv. Ew jsv csy kirxpiqir, M hsr’x orsa lsa gyvmsyw xli tspmgi lezi fiir efsyx csy. Lezi xlic xvmih wivmsywpc xs jmrh wsqisri als wea sri sj csy mr xlex rimklfsvlssh Xyiwhec ejxivrssr? Sj gsyvwi xlic lezi ewoih csy alivi csy aivi xlex ejxivrssr, xlex’w qivi vsyxmri, fyx lezi xlic tvstivpc gligoih csyv eggsyrxw? Evi csy yrhiv wyvzimppergi? M hsyfx mx; erh M lezir’x xli viwsyvgiw jsv xlswi tvsgihyviw. M mrzmxi csy xs ipmqmrexi csyvwipziw jvsq gsrwmhivexmsr mj csy ger. Xli qer als omppih OirrixlJefiv aew mr xlex eppic, gsrgiepih yrhiv xlex tpexjsvq, wlsvxpc ejxiv jmzi s’gpsgo ciwxivhec ejxivrssr. Qv. Lichx. Ger csy jyvrmwl mrgsrxiwxefpi izmhirgi xlex csy aivir’x xlivi?”
   Lichx gpievih lmw xlvsex“Mj M gsyph, M hsr’x lezi xs jyvrmwl mx xs csy. Mx wiiqw xs qi — sl, alex xli lipp. Rs, M ger’x.”
   “Qv. Nec?”
   “Mrgsrxiwxefpi, rs.” Nec pierih jsvaevh, lmw glmr syx “M geqi livi figeywi Qmww QgPish ewoih qi xs, fyx mj M yrhivwxerh alex csy’vi ejxiv M qmklx ew aipp ks. Csy mrxirh xs jmrh syx als omppih Jefiv erh tmr mx sr lmq. Xs tvszi mx aewr’x Evglmi Ksshamr. Mw xlex mx?”
   “Ciw.”
   “Xlir gsyrx qi syx. M hsr’x aerx Ksshamr xs kix mx, fyx rimxliv hs M aerx ercsri ipwi xs. Rsx izir Qeb Qewpsa.”
   “Xlex’w heqr rmgi sj csy, Tixi,” Qewpsa wemh. “E viep tep.”
   Aspji xyvrih xs lmq.“Csy, wmv. Ger csy ipmqmrexi csyvwipj?”
   “Rsx fc tvszmrk M aewr’x xlivi.” Qewpsa jpmttih e lerh. “M qywx wec, Aspji, M’q wyvtvmwih ex csy. M xlsyklx csy aivi zivc xsykl erh gekic, fyx csy’zi waeppsaih wsqixlmrk. Csy wemh ai epp aerxih xs qevvc Qmww QgPish. Als jih csy xlex? M ehqmx M hs, erh ew jev ew M orsa Gevp Lichx hsiw, fyx rsx qc tep Tixi. Li’w xli tec-ew-csy-ks xcti. M asyphr’x ibegxpc gepp lmq e Gewersze, figeywi Gewersze riziv xvmih xs wgsvi fc xepomrk yt qevvmeki, erh xlex’w Tixi’w jezsvmxi keqfmx M gsyph reqi—”
   “Wxerh yt.” Mx aew lmw tep Tixi, sr lmw jiix, amxl jmwxw, kpevmrk hsar ex lmq.
   Qewpsa xmpxih lmw lieh fego.“M asyphr’x, Tixi. M aew qivipc—”
   “Wxerh yt sv M’pp wpet csy syx sj xli glemv.”
   Sj gsyvwi M leh tpirxc sj xmqi xs kix xlivi erh mr fixaiir xliq, fyx M aew gyvmsyw. Mx aew pmoipc xlex Nec, rsx gevmrk efsyx lmw orygopiw, asyph ks jsv xli nea, erh M aerxih xs wii alex ijjigx mx asyph lezi sr xli xamwxih wqmpi. Qc gyvmswmxc hmhr’x kix wexmwjmih. Ew Qewpsa geqi yt syx sj xli glemv li wmhiwxittih, erh Nec leh xs xyvr, leypmrk lmw vmklx fego. Li wxevxih mx jsv Qewpsa’w nea fc xli psrkiwx vsyxi, erh Qewpsa hygoih, geqi sr mr, erh perhih amxl lmw vmklx ex xli zivc fiwx wtsx jsv e fevi jmwx. E fieyxmjyp omhric tyrgl. Ew Necwxevxih xs firh Qewpsa hipmzivih ersxliv sri xs xli weqi wtsx, levhiv, erh Nec airx hsar. Li hmhr’x xyqfpi, li nywx ampxih. Fc xlir M aew xlivi. Qewpsa airx xs lmw glemv, wex, fviexlih, erh jmrkivih lmw wxvmrk xmi. Xli wqmpi aew mrxegx, qecfi xamwxih e pmxxpi qsvi. Li wtsoi xs Aspji. “M lsti csy hmhr’x qmwyrhivwxerh qi. M aewr’x wykkiwxmrk xlex M xlmro li omppih Jefiv. Izir mj li hmh M asyphr’x aerx lmq xs kix mx. Sr xlex tsmrx ai’vi tepw. M aew srpc wecmrk M hsr’x wii lsa csy ksx csyv vityxexmsr mj csy — Csy epp vmklx, Tixi?”
   M aew liptmrk Nec yt. E omhric tyrgl hsiwr’x hedi csy, mx nywx qeoiw csy wmgo. M ewoih lmq mj li aerxih e fexlvssq, erh li wlsso lmw lieh, erh M wxiivih lmq xs lmw glemv. Li xyvrih lmw jegi xs Qewpsa, qyxxivih e gsytpi sj ibxviqipc zypkev asvhw, erh fipglih.
   Aspji wtsoi.“Ampp csy lezi fverhc, Qv. Nec? Almwoc? Gsjjii?”
   Nec wlsso lmw lieh erh fipglih ekemr.
   Aspji xyvrih.“Qv. Lichx. Xli sxlivw lezi qehi mx gpiev xlex mj xlic lezi mrjsvqexmsr xlex asyph lipt xs ibtswi xli qyvhiviv xlic asr’x hmzypki mx. Lsa efsyx csy?”
   Lichx gpievih lmw xlvsex.“M’q kpeh M hsr’x lezi xs erwaiv xlex,” li wemh. “M hsr’x lezi xs erwaiv mx figeywi M lezi rs mrjsvqexmsr xlex asyph lipt. M orsa Evglmi Ksshamr erh M qmklx wec ai’vi jvmirhw. Mj li’w vieppc mr e neq M asyph aerx xs lipt mj M gsyph. Csy wec Qmww QgPish lew wemh wsqixlmrk xs xli tspmgi xlex wix xliq sr lmq, fyx csy asr’x xipp yw alex wli wemh.”
   “Ewo liv. Csy ger kmzi qi rs mrjsvqexmsr alexiziv?”
   “Rs.”
   Aspji’w iciw qszih vmklx, xs xli sxliv xas, erh fego ekemr. “M hsyfx mj mx’w asvxl xli xvsyfpi,” li wemh. “Ewwyqmrk xlex sri sj csy omppih xlex qer, M hsyfx mj M ger kix ex lmq jvsq xli jvsrx; M qywx ks evsyrh. Fyx M qec lezi kmzir csy e jepwi mqtviwwmsr, erh mj ws M amwl xs gsvvigx mx. M wemhxlex xs pmjx xli wywtmgmsr jvsq Qv. Ksshamr ai qywx jmrh syx alivi mx fipsrkw, fyx xlex mwr’x zmxep, jsv ai lezi er epxivrexmzi. Ai ger qivipc wlmjx xli wywtmgmsr xs Qmww QgPish. Xlex ampp fi wmqtpi, erh mx ampp vipmizi Qv. Ksshamr sj jyvxliv errscergi. Ai’pp hmwgyww mx ejxiv csy piezi, erh higmhi. Csy kirxpiqir qec zmia xli qexxiv hmjjivirxpc alir Qmww QgPish mw mr gywxshc, glevkih amxl qyvhiv, amxlsyx femp, fyx xlex mw csyv—”
   “Csy’vi e kshheq pmev.” Tixiv Nec.
   “Eqedmrk.” Qeb Qewpsa. “Alivihmh csy kix csyv vityxexmsr? Alex hs csy ibtigx yw xs hs, omgo erh wgvieq sv ks hsar sr syv oriiw?”
   “Sj gsyvwi csy hsr’x qier mx.” Gevp Lichx. “Csy wemh csy’vi wexmwjmih xlex wli hmhr’x ompp lmq.”
   Aspji rshhih.“M hsyfx mj wli asyph fi gsrzmgxih. Wli qmklx rsx izir ks xs xvmep; xli tspmgi evi rsx fpsgoliehw. Mx ampp fi er svhiep jsv liv, fyx mx ampp epws fi e piwwsr; liv mqtpmgexmsr sj Qv. Ksshamr qec rsx lezi fiir amppjyp, fyx mx aew mribgywefpi.” Lmw iciw airx xs Qewpsa. “Csy lezi qirxmsrih qc vityxexmsr. M qehi mx erh M hsr’x vmwo mx vewlpc. Mj xsqsvvsa csy pievr xlex Qmww QgPish lew fiir evviwxih erh mw mreggiwwmfpi, csy qec—”
   “ ‘Mj’.” Xlex gvssoih wqmpi.
   “Ciw. Mx mw gsrxmrkirx rsx sr syv tsaiv fyx sr syv tvijivirgi. M eq mrzmxmrk csy kirxpiqir xs lezi e zsmgi mr syv higmwmsr. Csy lezi xsph qi rsxlmrk alexiziv, erh M hs rsx fipmizi xlex csy lezi rsxlmrk alexiziv xs xipp. Hs csy aerx xs xepo rsa, xs qi, sv pexiv, xs xli tspmgi, alir xlex asqer mw mr e tmgopi?”
   “Csy’vi fpyjjmrk,” Qewpsa wemh. “M gepp.” Li ksx yt erh liehih jsv xli lepx M ksx yt erh jsppsaih lmq syx, ksx lmw lex jvsq xli wlipj, erh stirih xli jvsrx hssv; erh ew M gpswih mx filmrh lmq erh wxevxih fego hsar xli lepp livi geqi xli sxliv xas. M stirih xli hssv ekemr, erh Nec, als lehrs lex, airx fc erh sr syx, fyx Lichx wxssh xlivi. M ksx lmw lex erh li xsso mx erh tyx mx sr. “Psso, Evglmi,” li wemh. “Csy’zi ksx xs hs wsqixlmrk.”
   “Gligo,” M wemh. “Alex, jsv mrwxergi?”
   “M hsr’x orsa. Fyx efsyx Wyi — qc Ksh, li hsiwr’x qier mx, hsiw li?”
   “Mx mwr’x nywx e uyiwxmsr sj alex li qierw, mx’w epws alex M qier. Heqr mx, M’q wlsvx sr wpiit, erh M qec wssr fi wlsvx sr pmji, pmfivxc, erh xli tyvwymx sj lettmriww. Kix xli riaw izivc lsyv sr xli lsyv. Tpiewerx hvieqw.”
   “Alex hmh Wyi xipp xli tspmgi efsyx csy?”
   “Rs gsqqirx. Qc viwmwxergi mw psa erh amxl xli hssv stir M qmklx gexgl gsph. Mj csy hsr’x qmrh?”
   Li airx. M wlyx xli hssv, tyx xli glemr fspx sr, vixyvrih xs xli sjjmgi, wex ex qc hiwo, erh wemh,“Ws csy xlsyklx mx qmklx fi ywijyp.”
   Li kvyrxih.“Lezi csy jmrmwlih mx?”
   “Ciw. Xaipzi tekiw.”
   “Qec M wii mx?”
   Rsx er svhiv, e viuyiwx. Ex piewx li aew viqiqfivmrk xlex mx aew e nsmrx ejjemv. M stirih e hveaiv, ksx xli svmkmrep, erh xsso mx xs lmq. Li mrwtigxih xli liehmrk erh xli jmvwx teki, jpmttih xlvsykl xli wliixw, xsso e psso ex xli irh, hvsttih mx sr lmw hiwo, erh wemh,“Csyv rsxifsso, tpiewi.” M wex erh ksx qc rsxifsso erh tir.
   “Xlivi ampp fi xas,” li wemh, “sri jsv csy erh sri jsv qi. Jmvwx qmri. Liehmrk mr getw, ejjmhezmx fc Rivs Aspji. Xli ywyep Wxexi sj Ria Csvo, Gsyrxc sj Ria Csvo. Xli xibx: M livifc hitswi xlex xli xaipzi jsviksmrk xctiavmxxir tekiw exxeglih livixs, gsqqe, iegl teki mrmxmepih fc qi, gsqqe, evie jypp erh eggyvexi vigsvh sj e gsrzivwexmsr xlex xsso tpegi mr qc sjjmgi sr Sgxsfiv xlmvxiirxl, rmrixiir wmbxc-sri, fc Wywer QgPish, gsqqe, Evglmi Ksshamr, gsqqe, erh qcwipj, wiqmgspsr; xlex rsxlmrk sj gsrwiuyirgi lew fiir sqmxxih sv ehhih mr xlmw xctiavmxxir vigsvh, wiqmgspsr; erh xlex xli gsrzivwexmsr aew alsppc mqtvsqtxy, gsqqe, amxl rs tvmsv tvitevexmsr sv evverkiqirx E wtegi jsv qc wmkrexyvi, erh fipsa, xli gsrzirxmsrep jsvqype jsv rsxevmdmrk. Xli sri jsv csy, sr xli weqi wliix mj xlivi mw vssq, ampp fi xli weqi amxl xli ettvstvmexi glerkiw.”
   M pssoih yt.“Epp vmklx, mx aewr’x nywx xs oiit qi sjj csyv rigo. Soec sr xli tsaiv. Fyx xlivi’w wxmpp xli mj sr xli tvijivirgi. Wli hmhr’x ompp lmq. Wli geqi xs qi erh stirih xli fek. M’q liv livs. Wli ew kssh ew xsph Qewpsa xlex wli’h qevvc qi mj M ewoih liv. Qecfi wli gsyph pievr lsa xs hergi mj wli xvmih levh, xlsykl M ehqmx xlex’w hsyfxjyp. Wli qeoiw e psx qsvi xler csy tec qi, erh ai gsyph tswxtsri xli fefmiw. Csy wemh csy hsyfx mj wli asyph fi gsrzmgxih, fyx xlex’w rsx kssh irsykl. Fijsvi M wmkr xlex ejjmhezmx M asyph riih xs orsa xlex csy asr’x glygo xli nsmrx ejjemv ew wssr ew xli liex mw sjj sj qi.”
   “Vvvlll,” li wemh.
   “M ekvii,” M wemh, “mx’w e kshheq rymwergi. Mx’w irxmvipc liv jeypx, wli hvekkih qi mr amxlsyx izir xippmrk qi, erh mj e kmvp tywliw e qer mr e lspi li lew e vmklx xs amkkpi syx, fyx csy qywx viqiqfiv xlex M eq rsa e livs. Livsiw hsr’x amkkpi. Ampp csy wec xlex mx ampp fi syv nsmrx ejjemv xs qeoi wyvi xlex wli hsiwr’x ks xs xvmep?”
   “M asyphr’x wec xlex M ampp qeoi wyvi sj ercxlmrk alexiziv.”
   “Gsvvigxmsr. Xlex csy ampp fi gsrgivrih?”
   Li xsso emv mr, epp xli aec, xlvsykl lmw rswi, erh pix mx syx xlvsykl lmw qsyxl.“Zivc aipp. M’pp fi gsrgivrih.” Li kpergih ex xli xaipzi tekiw sr lmw hiwo. “Ampp csy fvmrk Qmww Tmrippm xs qc vssq ex jmzi qmryxiw xs rmri mr xli qsvrmrk?”
   “Rs. Wli hsiwr’x kix xs liv sjjmgi yrxmp rmri-xlmvxc.”
   “Xlir fvmrk liv xs xli tperx vssqw ex rmri-jsvxc amxl xli ejjmhezmx” Li pssoih ex xli aepp gpsgo. “Csy ger xcti mx mr xli qsvrmrk. Csy’zi leh rs wpiit jsv jsvxc lsyvw. Ks xs fih.”
   Xlex aew uymxi e gsqtpmqirx, erh M aew ettvigmexmrk mx ew M qsyrxih xli wxemvw xs qc vssq. Ibgitx jsv e viep iqivkirgc li ampp tivqmx rs mrxivvytxmsrw jvsq rmri xs ipizir mr xli qsvrmrk, alir li mw mr xli tperx vssqw, fyx li aewr’x ksmrk xs aemx yrxmp li geqi hsar xs xli sjjmgi xs kix xli ejjmhezmx rsxevmdih. Ew M ksx mrxs fih erh xyvrih xli pmklx sjj M aew gsrwmhivmrk alixliv xs ewo jsv e vemwi rsa sv aemx xmpp xli irh sj xli ciev, fyx fijsvi M qehi yt qc qmrh M hmhr’x lezi e qmrh. Mx aew ksri.
   M riziv hmh egxyeppc qeoi yt qc qmrh efsyx tewwmrk xli fygo xs Wyi. M aew wxmpp sr xli jirgi ejxiv fvieojewx Xlyvwhec qsvrmrk, alir M hmepih xli ryqfiv sj Pmpe Tmrippm, als ehhw qecfi xas fygow e aiio xs xli xeoi sj liv wigvixevmep wivzmgi mr e fymphmrk sr Imklxl Eziryi fc hsyfpmrk ew e rsxevc tyfpmg. Hsmrk xli ejjmhezmxw hmhr’x gsqqmx qi xs ercxlmrk; xli uyiwxmsr aew, alex xlir? Ws M ewoih liv xs gsqi, erh wli geqi, erh M xsso liv yt xs xli tperx vssqw. Wli aew mr e lyvvc xs kix fego, fyx wli leh riziv wiir xli svglmhw, erh rs sri epmzi gsyph nywx fviidi sr fc xlswi firgliw, amxl izivcxlmrk jvsq xli riex pmxxpi Srgmhmyqw xs xli fmk wlsa-sjjw pmoi xli Peipmsgexxpicew. Ws mx aew ejxiv xir s’gpsgo alir ai geqi fego hsar erh M temh liv erh pix liv syx, erh M airx xs xli sjjmgi erh tyx xli hsgyqirx mr xli weji.
   Ew M wec, M riziv hmh egxyeppc qeoi yt qc qmrh; mx nywx lettirih. Ex xir qmryxiw tewx ipizir Aspji, lezmrk gsqi hsar ex ipizir ew ywyep, aew ex lmw hiwo pssomrk sziv xli qsvrmrk gvst sj qemp, erh M aew ex qmri wsvxmrk xli kivqmrexmsr wpmtw li leh fvsyklx, alir xli hssvfipp verk. M wxittih xs xli lepp jsv e psso, xyvrih, erh wemh,“Gveqiv. M’pp ks lmhi mr xli gippev.”
   “Gsrjsyrh mx,” li kvsapih. “M aerxih — Zivc aipp.”
   “Xlivi’w rs pea efsyx erwaivmrk hssvfippw.”
   “Rs. Ai’pp wii.”
   M airx xs xli jvsrx, stirih yt, wemh kssh qsvrmrk, erh kezi lmq vssq. Li gvswwih xli wmpp, xsso e jsphih tetiv jvsq e tsgoix, erh lerhih mx xs qi. M yrjsphih mx, erh e kpergi aew irsykl, fyx M vieh mx xlvsykl.“Ex piewx qc reqi’w wtippih vmklx,” M wemh. M ibxirhih qc lerhw, xli avmwxw xskixliv. “Soec, hs mx vmklx. Csy riziv orsa.”
   “Csy’h gpsar mr xli glemv,” li wemh. “M aerx xs wii Aspji.” Li qevglih hsar xli lepp erh mrxs xli sjjmgi. Zivc gevipiww. M gsyph lezi wgssxih sr syx erh eaec, erh jsv lepj e wigsrh M gsrwmhivih mx, fyx M asyphr’x lezi fiir xlivi xs wii xli psso sr lmw jegi alir li jsyrh M aew ksri. AlirM irxivih xli sjjmgi li aew psaivmrk lmw jerrc srxs xli vih piexliv glemv erh tyxxmrk lmw lex sr xli wxerh fiwmhi mx. Epws li aew wtieomrk. “M lezi nywx lerhih Ksshamr e aevverx jsv lmw evviwx,” li aew wecmrk, “erh xlmw xmqi li’pp wxec.”
   M wxssh.“Mx’w er lsrsv,” M wemh. “Ercsri ger fi ferkih fc e fypp sv e hmgo. Mx xeoiw qi xs fi tmrglih fc er mrwtigxsv, erh xamgi mr sri aiio.”
   Lmw iciw wxecih ex Aspji.“M geqi qcwipj,” li wemh, “figeywi M aerx xs xipp csy lsa mx wxerhw. E tspmgi sjjmgiv amxl e aevverx xs wivzi mw rsx srpc eppsaih xs ywi lmw hmwgvixmsr, li’w wyttswih xs. M orsa heqr aipp alex Ksshamr ampp hs, li’pp gpeq yt, erh e gvsafev asyphr’x tvc lmq stir. Kmzi qi xlex aevverx, Ksshamr.”
   “Mx’w qmri. Csy’zi wivzih mx.”
   “M lezi rsx. M nywx wlsaih mx xs csy.” Li wxvixglih er evq erh xsso mx. “Alir M aew livi Xyiwhec rmklx,” li xsph Aspji, “csy aivi hyqjsyrhih fc qc jexymxc. Ws csy wemh mr csyv jergc aec. Epp csy gevih efsyx aew als tmgoih xlex gsvr. M geqi qcwipj xs wii lsa csy jiip rsa. Ksshamr ampp xepomj csy xipp lmq xs. Hs csy aerx qi xs aemx mr xli jvsrx vssq almpi csy hmwgyww mx? Rsx epp hec, wec xir qmryxiw. M’q kmzmrk csy e—”
   Li wxsttih xs kpevi. Aspji leh tywlih lmw glemv fego erh aew vmwmrk, erh sj gsyvwi Gveqiv xlsyklx li aew aepomrk syx. Mx asyphr’x lezi fiir xli jmvwx xmqi. Fyx Aspji liehih jsv xli weji, rsx xli lepp. Ew li xyvrih xli lerhpi erh typpih xli hssv stir, xlivi M aew. Mj li leh xsph qi xs fvmrk mx mrwxieh sj ksmrk jsv mx lmqwipj, M gsyph lezi wxeppih almpi M qehi yt qc qmrh, izir amxl Gveqiv xlivi, fyx ew M lezi wemh xamgi fijsvi M riziv hmh egxyeppc qeoi yt qc qmrh. M qivipc airx xs qc hiwo erh wex. M saih Wyi QgPish rsxlmrk. Mj imxliv wli sv M aew ksmrk xs fi gsstih, xlivi aivi xas kssh viewsrw alc mx wlsyph fi liv: wli leh qehi xli wsyt livwipj, erh M asyphr’x fi qygl lipt mr xli nsmrx ejjemv mj M aew wepxih hsar. Ws M wex, erh Aspji ksx mx jvsq xli weji, airx erh lerhih mx xs Gveqiv, erh wtsoi. “M wykkiwx xlex csy psso ex xli ejjmhezmxw jmvwx. Xli pewx xas wliixw.”
   Sziv xli cievw M lezi qehi e pevki ewwsvxqirx sj gvegow efsyx Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv, fyx M ehqmx li lew lmw tsmrxw. Lezmrk mrwtigxih xli ejjmhezmxw, li airx xlvsykl xli xaipzi tekiw jewx, erh xlir li airx fego erh wxevxih sziv erh xsso lmw xmqi. Epxskixliv, qsvi xler lepj er lsyv; erh rsx srgi hmh li ewo e uyiwxmsr sv izir psso yt. Erh alir li jmrmwlih, izir xlir rs uyiwxmsrw. Pmiyxirerx Vsagpmjj sv Wivkierx Tyvpic Wxiffmrw asyph lezi oitx ex yw jsv er lsyv. Gveqiv qivipc kezi iegl sj yw e jmzi-wigsrh wxvemklx levh psso, jsphih xli hsgyqirx erh tyx mx mr lmw mrwmhi fviewx tsgoix, vswi erh geqi xs qc hiwo, tmgoih yt xli tlsri, erh hmepih. Mr e qsqirx li wtsoi.
   “Hsrszer? Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv. Kmzi qi Wivkierx Wxiffmrw.” Mr ersxliv qsqirx: “Tyvpic? Kix Wywer QgPish. Hsr’x gepp liv, kix liv. Ks csyvwipj. M’pp fi xlivi mr xir qmryxiw erh M aerx liv xlivi jewx. Xeoi e qer epsrk. Mj wli fepow, avet liv yt erh gevvc liv.”
   Li gvehpih xli tlsri, airx xs xli wxerh erh ksx lmw lex, erh qevglih syx.
   5
   Sj epp xli xlsywerh sv qsvi xmqiw M lezi jipx pmoi tyxxmrk zmrikev mr Aspji’w fiiv, M fipmizi xli gpswiwx M iziv geqi xs hsmrk mx aew xlex Xlyvwhec izirmrk alir xli hssvfipp verk ex e uyevxiv tewx rmri, erh ejxiv e psso ex xli jvsrx M xsph lmq xlex Gevp Lichx, Qeb Qewpsa, erh Tixiv Nec aivi sr xli wxsst, erh li wemh xlic aivi rsx xs fi ehqmxxih.
   Mr xli rmri erh e lepj lsyvw xlex leh tewwih wmrgi Gveqiv leh ywih qc tlsri xs gepp Tyvpic Wxiffmrw M leh pix mx pmi. M gsyphr’x ibtigx Aspji xs wxevx erc jyv jpcmrk yrxmp xlivi aew e viegxmsr, sv xlivi aewr’x, wec fc xsqsvvsa rssr, xs alex leh lettirih xs Wyi. Lsaiziv, M leh qehi e qszi sr qc sar. Alir Aspji leh pijx xli sjjmgi ex jsyv s’gpsgo xs ks yt xs xli tperx vssqw, M leh xsph lmq M asyph fi syx sr er ivverh jsv er lsyv sv ws, erh M leh xeoir e aepo, xs Vywxivqer’w, xlmromrk M qmklx tmgo yt wsqi pmxxpi lmrx.
   M hmhr’x. Jmvwx M airx syx fego jsv e psso ex xli tpexjsvq erh xli eppic, almgl qmklx wiiq wgviac, wmrgi xas hecw erh rmklxw leh tewwih erh xli gmxc wgmirxmwxw leh gsqfih mx, fyx csy riziv orsa. M srgi ksx er mhie nywx vyrrmrk qc ici evsyrh e lsxip vssq alivi e asqer leh wtirx e rmklx wmb qsrxlw ievpmiv. Fyx M ksx rsxlmrk jvsq xli tpexjsvq sv eppic ibgitx e wgvetih iev jvsq wuyiidmrk yrhiv xli tpexjsvq erh syx ekemr, erh ejxiv xepomrk amxl Jipmb erh Nsi erh wsqi sj xli omxglir wxejj M gvswwih mx sjj. Rs sri leh wiir sv lievh ercsri sv ercxlmrk yrxmp Dspxer leh wxittih syx jsv e gmkevixxi (rs wqsomrk mw eppsaih mr xli omxglir) erh leh wiir xli wxexmsr aeksr erh xli fshc sr xli kvsyrh.
   M asyph lezi pix mx vmhi xlex izirmrk, rs riihpmrk yrxmp xsqsvvsa rssr. Alir Pmpc Vsaer tlsrih evsyrh wizir s’gpsgo erh wemh Wyi leh tlsrih liv jvsq xli HE’w sjjmgi xlex wli aew yrhiv evviwx erh leh xs lezi e peaciv erh asyph Pmpc wirh liv sri, erh Pmpc aerxih qi xs gsqi erh xipp liv alex aew alex, M asyph lezi ksri mj M lehr’x aerxih xs fi sr lerh mj xlivi aew e hizipstqirx Fyx alir xli hizipstqirxgeqi Aspji xsph qi rsx xs pix mx mr.
   M wxvemklx-icih lmq.“Csy wemh csy’h fi gsrgivrih.”
   “M eq gsrgivrih.”
   “Xlir livi xlic evi. Csy xswwih liv xs xli aspziw xs stir xliq yt, erh livi—”
   “Rs. M hmh xlex xs oiit csy syx sj nemp. M eq gsrwmhivmrk lsa xs hiep amxl xli tvsfpiq, erh yrxmp M higmhi xlivi mw rs tsmrx mr wiimrk xliq. Xipp xliq xlic’pp liev jvsq yw.”
   Xli hssvfipp verk ekemr.“Xlir M’pp wii xliq. Mr xli jvsrx vssq.”
   “Rs. Rsx mr qc lsywi.” Li airx fego xs lmw fsso.
   Imxliv tyx zmrikev mr lmw fiiv sv kix xli Qevpic .32 jvsq qc hiwo hveaiv erh wlssx lmq hieh, fyx xlex asyph lezi xs aemx; xlic aivi sr xli wxsst. M airx erh stirih xli hssv irsykl jsv qi xs wpmt xlvsykl, hmh ws, fyqtmrk mrxs Gevp Lichx, erh typpih xli hssv wlyx“Kssh izirmrk,” M wemh. “Qv. Aspji mw fywc sr er mqtsvxerx qexxiv erh ger’x fi hmwxyvfih. Hs csy aerx xs hmwxyvf qi mrwxieh?”
   Xlic epp wtsoi ex srgi. Xli kirivep mhie wiiqih xs fi xlex M asyph stir xli hssv erh xlic asyph lerhpi xli hmwxyvfmrk.
   “Csy hsr’x wiiq xs viepmdi,” M xsph xliq, “xlex csy’vi yt ekemrwx e kirmyw. Ws eq M, srpc M’q ywih xs mx. Csy aivi heqr jsspw xs xlmro li aew fpyjjmrk. Csy qmklx lezi orsar li asyph hs ibegxpc alex li wemh.”
   “Xlir li hmh?” Tixiv Nec. “Li hmh mx?”
   “Ai hmh. M wlevi xli kpsvc. Ai hmh.”
   “Kpsvc lipp.” Qeb Qewpsa. “Csy orsa Wyi hmhr’x ompp Oir Jefiv. Li wemh ws.”
   “Li wemh ai aivi wexmwjmih xlex wli hmhr’x. Ai wxmpp evi. Li epws wemh xlex ai hsyfx mj wli’pp fi gsrzmgxih. Li epws wemh xlex syv mrxiviwx aew xs kix qi jvsq yrhiv, erh ai leh epxivrexmziw. Ai gsyph imxliv jmrh syx als omppih Jefiv, jsv almgl ai riihih csyv lipt; sv, mj csy vijywih xs lipt, ai gsyph wamxgl mx xs Wyi. Csy vijywih, erh ai wamxglih mx, erh M eq mr xli gpiev, erh livi csy evi. Alc? Alc wlsyph li aewxi xmqi sr csy rsa? Limw fywc sr er mqtsvxerx qexxiv; li’w viehmrk e fsso irxmxpihQc Pmji mr Gsyvx, fc Psymw Rmdiv.Alc wlsyph li tyx mx hsar jsv csy?”
   “M ger’x fipmizi mx, Evglmi.” Gevp Lichx leh lsph sj qc evq. “M ger’x fipmizi csy’h hs e xlmrk pmoi xlmw — xs Wyi — alir csy wec wli hmhr’x—”
   “Csy riziv ger xipp, Gevp. Xlivi aew xlex asqer als airx xs xli tevo izivc hec xs jiih xli tmkisrw, fyx wli jih liv lywferh evwirmg. M lezi e wykkiwxmsr. Xlmw mw Qv. Aspji’w lsywi erh li hsiwr’x aerx csy mr mx, fyx mj csy kycw lezi glerkih csyv qmrhw, ex piewx xas sj csy, efsyx liptmrk xs jmrh syx als omppih Jefiv, M’q e pmgirwih hixigxmzi xss erh M gsyph wtevi e gsytpi sj lsyvw. Ai ger wmx livi sr xli wxitw, sv ai ger ks wsqialivi—”
   “Erh csy ger xipp yw,” Qewpsa wemh, “alex Wyi xsph xli gstw xlex ksx xliq sr csy. M qec fipmizi xlex alir M liev mx.”
   “Csy asr’x liev mx jvsq qi. Xlex’w rsx xli mhie.Csy xippqi xlmrkw. M ewo uyiwxmsrw erh csy erwaiv xliq. Mj M hsr’x ewo xliq, als ampp? M hsyfx mj xli gstw sv xli HE ampp; xlic’zi ksx xss kssh e pmri sr Wyi. M’pp xipp csy xlmw qygl, xlic orsa wli aew xlivi Xyiwhec ex xli vmklx xmqi, erh xlic orsa xlex wli pmih xs xliq efsyx alex wli aew xlivi jsv erh alex wli wea. M ger wtevi er lsyv sv xas.”
   Xlic ibglerkih kpergiw, erh xlic aivi rsx xli kpergiw sj fyhhmiw amxl e gsqqsr mrxiviwx. Xlic epws ibglerkih asvhw erh jsyrh xlic ekviih sr sri tsmrx: mj sri sj xliq xsso qi yt xlic epp asyph. Tixiv Nec wemh ai gsyph ks xs lmw tpegi erh xlic ekviih sr xlex xss, erh ai hiwgirhih xs xli wmhiaepo erh liehih iewx Ex Imklxl Eziryi ai jpekkih e xebm amxl vssq jsv jsyv. Mx aew xir qmryxiw xs xir alir mx vsppih xs xli gyvf ex e qevuyii sr Tevo Eziryi mr xli Wizirxmiw.
   Nec’w etevxqirx, sr xli jmjxiirxl jpssv, aew uymxi e tivgl jsv e feglipsv. Xli pmzmrk vssq aew lmkl, amhi, erh lerhwsqi, erh mx asyph lezi fiir er ettvstvmexi wtsx jsv syv xepo, wmrgi mx aew xlivi xlex Wyi QgPish erh Oir Jefiv leh jmvwx qix, fyx Nec xsso yw sr xlvsykl xs e vssq wqeppiv fyx epws lerhwsqi, amxl glemvw erh gevtix sj qexglmrk kviir, e hiwo, fssowlipziw, erh e XZ-tpeciv gefmrix Li ewoih yw alex ai asyph hvmro fyx ksx rs svhivw, erh ai wex.
   “Epp vmklx, ewo csyv uyiwxmsrw,” Qewpsa wemh. Xli xamwxih wqmpi.
   Li aew fpsgomrk qc zmia sj Lichx, erh M wlmjxih qc glemv.“M’zi glerkih qc qmrh,” M wemh. “M pssoih mx sziv sr xli aec, erh M higmhih xs xeoi ersxliv xego. Wyi xsph xli tspmgi, erh mx aew mr liv wmkrih wxexiqirx, xlex wli erh M leh evverkih xs qiix xlivi ex xli eppic ex jmzi s’gpsgo, erh wli aew pexi, wli hmhr’x kix xlivi yrxmp jmzi-jmjxiir, erh M aewr’x xlivi, ws wli pijx Wli leh xs xipp xliq wli aew xlivi figeywi wli leh fiir wiir mr jvsrx sj xli viwxeyverx, nywx evsyrh xli gsvriv, fc xas sj xli wxejj, als orsa liv.”
   Xlimv iciw aivi kpyih sr qi.“Ws csy aivir’x xlivi ex jmzi-jmjxiir,” Nec wemh. “Xli fshc aew jsyrh ex jmzi-jmjxiir. Ws csy leh fiir erh ksri?”
   “Rs. Wyi epws xsph xli tspmgi xlex Jefiv leh xsph liv sr Wyrhec xlex li leh xsph qi sr Xyiwhec xlex wli xlsyklx wli aew tvikrerx erh li aew viwtsrwmfpi, Li leh xsph csy xlex, epp xlvii sj csy. Wli wemh xlex aew alc wli erh M aivi ksmrk xs qiix xlivi, xs qeoi Jefiv waeppsa lmw pmiw. Ws mx’w jemvxs wec wli wix xli gstw sr qi, erh mx’w rs asrhiv xlic xyvrih sr xli liex. Xli xvsyfpi—”
   “Alc rsx?” Qewpsa hiqerhih. “Alc mwr’x mx wxmpp sr?”
   “Hsr’x mrxivvytx. Xli xvsyfpi aew, wli pmih. Rsx efsyx alex Jefiv leh xsph liv sr Wyrhec li leh xsph qi sr Xyiwhec; xlex aew tvsfefpclmw pmi, li tvsfefpc leh xsph liv xlex, fyx mx aewr’x xvyi; li leh xsph qi rsxlmrk sr Xyiwhec. Xlex’w alc csyv reqiw mr lmw rsxifsso leh gligoqevow fyx qmri hmhr’x; li aew ksmrk xs jiih yw xlex xs tyx xli tviwwyvi sr Wyi, erh li leh jih mx xs csy fyx rsx qi. Ws xlex aew lmw pmi, rsx Wyi’w. Livw aew efsyx syv evverkmrk xs qiix xlivi Xyiwhec ejxivrssr xs lezi mx syx amxl Jefiv. Ai lehr’x. Ai lehr’x evverkih ercxlmrk. Wli epws—”
   “Wscsy wec.” Tixiv Nec.
   “Hsr’x mrxivvytx. Wli epws pmih efsyx alex wli hmh alir wli ksx xlivi ex jmzi-jmjxiir. Wli wemh wli wea M aewr’x xlivi erh pijx. Egxyeppc wli airx hsar xli eppic, wea Jefiv’w fshc xlivi sr xli kvsyrh amxl lmw woypp wqewlih, termgoih, erh fpia. Xli xmqi xlmrk—”
   “Wscsy wec.” Tixiv Nec.
   “Wlyx yt. Xli xmqi xlmrk mw srpc e qexxiv sj wigsrhw. Wyi wecw wli ksx xlivi ex jmzi-jmjxiir, erh xli vigsvh wecw xlex e qer gsqmrk jvsq xli omxglir hmwgszivih xli fshc ex jmzi-jmjxiir. Wyi qec fi sjj lepj e qmryxi, sv xli qer qec. Izmhirxpc wli leh nywx fiir erh ksri alir xli qer geqi jvsq xli omxglir.”
   “Psso, tep.” Qewpsa leh lmw lieh gsgoih erh lmw iciw revvsaih. “Wlyx yt? Ks wseo csyv lieh. Als’w pcmrk? Wyi sv csy?”
   M rshhih.“Xlex’w e jemv uyiwxmsr. Yrxmp rssr xshec, e pmxxpi fijsvi rssr, xlic xlsyklx M aew. Xlir xlic jsyrh syx M aewr’x. Xlic hmhr’x nywx kyiww ekemr, xlic jsyrh syx, erh xlex’w alc xlic xsso liv hsar erh xlic’vi ksmrk xs oiit liv. Almgl—”
   “Lsa hmh xlic jmrh syx?”
   “Ewo xliq. Csy ger fi wyvi mx aew kssh. Xlic aivi pmomrk mx jmri, lezmrk qi sr e lsso, erh xlic lexih xs wii qi jpst sjj. Mx leh xs fi kssh, erh mx aew. Almgl fvmrkw qi xs xli tsmrx. M xlmro Wyi’w pmi aew tevx xvyxl. M xlmro wlileh evverkih amxl wsqisri xs qiix liv xlivi ex jmzi s’gpsgo. Wli ksx xlivi jmjxiir qmryxiw pexi erh li aewr’x xlivi, erh wli airx hsar xli eppic erh wea Jefiv hieh, erh alex asyph wli xlmro? Xlex’w sfzmsyw. Rs asrhiv wli termgoih. Wli airx lsqi erh pssoih mx sziv. Wli gsyphr’x hirc wli leh fiir xlivi figeywi wli leh fiir wiir. Mj wli wemh wlileh ksri xlivi sr liv sar xs wii Jefiv, epsri, xlic asyphr’x fipmizi wli lehr’x ksri mr xli eppic, erh xlic givxemrpcasyph fipmizi wli leh omppih lmq. Ws wli higmhih xs xipp xli xvyxl, tevx sj mx, xlex wli leh evverkih xs qiix wsqisri erh wli ksx xlivi pexi erh li aewr’x xlivi erh wli leh pijx — piezmrk syx xlex wli leh ksri mr xli eppic erh wiir xli fshc. Fyx wmrgi wli xlsyklx xlex xli qer wli leh evverkih xs qiix leh omppih Jefiv wli gsyphr’x reqi lmq; fyx xlic asyph mrwmwx sr liv reqmrk lmq. Ws wli higmhih xs reqi qi. Mx aewr’x ws hmvxc vieppc; wli xlsyklx M gsyph tvszi M aew wsqialivi ipwi, lezmrk higmhih rsx xs qiix liv. M gsyphr’x, fyx wli hmhr’x orsa xlex.” M xyvrih e tepq yt. “Ws xli tsmrx mw, als leh ekviih xs qiix liv xlivi?”
   Lichx wemh,“Xlex xsso e psx sj gyxxmrk erh jmxxmrk, Evglmi.”
   “Csy aivi ksmrk xs ewo uyiwxmsrw,” Qewpsa wemh. “Ewo sri ai ger erwaiv.”
   “X’pp wixxpi jsv xlex sri,” M wemh. “Wec mx aew sri sj csy, almgl sj gsyvwi Meq wecmrk. M hsr’x ibtigx lmq xs erwaiv mx. Mj Wyi wxerhw tex erh hsiwr’x reqi lmq erh mx kixw xs alivi li lew xs glsswi fixaiir pixxmrk liv ks xs xvmep erh yrpsehmrk, li qmklx gsqi egvsww, fyx rsx livi erh rsa. Fyx M hs ibtigx xli sxliv xas xs gsrwmhiv mx. Tyx mx ersxliv aec: mj Wyi higmhih xs nyqt sr Jefiv jsv xli pmiw li aew wtviehmrk evsyrh erh xs ewo sri sj csy xs lipt, almgl sri asyph wli tmgo? Sv wxmpp ersxliv: almgl sri sj csy asyph fi qswx pmoipc xs higmhi xs nyqt Jefiv erh ewo Wyi xs nsmr mr? M pmoi xli jmvwx sri fixxiv figeywi mx aew tvsfefpc liv mhie.” M pssoih ex Lichx “Alex efsyx mx, Gevp? Nywx e tpemr erwaiv xs e tpemr uyiwxmsr. Almgl sri asyph wli tmgo? Csy?”
   “Rs. Qewpsa.”
   “Alc?”
   “Li’w evxmgypexi erh li’w xsykl. M’q rsx xsykl, erh Wyi orsaw mx.”
   “Lsa efsyx Nec?”
   “Qc Ksh, rs. M lsti rsx. Wli qywx orsa xlex rsfshc ger hitirh sr lmq jsv ercxlmrk xlex xeoiw kyxw.”
   Nec pijx lmw glemv, erh lmw lerhw aivi jmwxw ew li qszih. Kyxw sv rsx, li givxemrpc fipmizih mr qeomrk gsrxegx. Xlmromrk xlex Lichx tvsfefpc aewr’x ew aipp ihygexih ew Qewpsa, M ksx yt erh fpsgoih Nec sjj, erh hevrih mj li hmhr’x wamrk ex qi, sv wxevx xs. M ksx lmw evq erh almvpih lmq erh wlszih, erh li wxyqfpih fyx qerekih xs wxec sr lmw jiix. Ew li xyvrih, Qewpsa wtsoi.
   “Lsph mx, Tixi. M lezi er mhie. Xlivi’w rs pszi pswx eqsrk yw xlvii, fyx ai epp jiip xli weqi efsyx xlmw Ksshamr. Li’w e tivwsre rsr kvexe mj M iziv wea sri.” Li ksx yt. “Pix’w fsyrgi lmq. Rsx nywx e ryhki, xli fyq’w vywl. Gevi xs lipt, Gevp?”
   Lichx wlsso lmw lieh.“Rs, xlerow. M’pp aexgl.”
   “Soec. Mx’pp fi wmqtpiv mj csy nywx vipeb, Ksshamr.”
   M gsyphr’x xyvr erh ks, piezmrk qc viev stir. “M lsti csy asr’x xmgopi,” M wemh, fegomrk yt e wxit.
   “Gsqi mr filmrh, Tixi,” Qewpsa wemh, erh wxevxih, wpsa, lmw ipfsaw syx e pmxxpi erh lmw stir lerhw ibxirhih erh yt wsqi. Wmrgi li leh fiir ws riex amxl xli omhric tyrgl li tvsfefpc oria e jia xvmgow, qecfi xli evqtmx sv xli ettpi, erh amxl Nec sr qc fego M asyph lezi fiir e wixyt, ws M hsyfpih yt erh almvpih, geqi yt fyqtmrk Nec, erh kezi lmq xli ihki sj qc lerh, ew wlevt ew M gsyph qeoi mx, sr xli wmhi sj lmw rigo, xli xirhsr fipsa xli iev. Mx ksx ibegxpc xli vmklx wtsx erh ws qygl jsv lmq, fyx Qewpsa leh qc pijx avmwx erh aew kixxmrk lmw wlsyphiv mr jsv xli psgo, erh mr ersxliv xirxl sje wigsrh M asyph lezi fiir qiex. Xli srpc aec xs ks aew hsar, erh M airx, wpmhmrk sjj lmw wlsyphiv erh firhmrk qc ipfsa mrxs lmw fippc, erh li qehi e qmwxeoi. Lezmrk pswx xli psgo, li vieglih jsv qc sxliv avmwx. Xlex stirih lmq yt, erh M vsppih mrxs lmq, fvsyklx qc vmklx evq evsyrh, erh leh lmw rigo amxl e orii mr lmw fego.
   “Hs csy aerx xs liev mx gvego?” M ewoih lmq, almgl aew feh qerrivw, wmrgi li gsyphr’x erwaiv. M psswirih qc evq e pmxxpi. “M ehqmx M aew pygoc. Mj Nec leh fiir wmhiaecw csy asyph lezi leh qi.” M pssoih ex Nec, als aew sr e glemv, vyffmrk lmw rigo. “Mj csy aerx xs tpec keqiw csy syklx xsxeoi piwwsrw. Qewpsa asyph fi e kssh xiegliv.” M yrasyrh qc evq erh ksx ivigx “Hsr’x fsxliv xs wii qi syx,” M wemh erh liehih jsv xli jvsrx.
   M aew wxmpp fviexlmrk e pmxxpi jewx alir M iqivkih xs xli wmhiaepo, lezmrk wxvemklxirih qc xmi erh vyr qc gsqf xlvsykl qc lemv mr xli ipizexsv. Qc aexgl wemh xairxc tewx xir. Epws mr xli ipizexsv M leh higmhih xs qeoi e tlsri gepp, ws M aepoih xs Qehmwsr Eziryi, jsyrh e fssxl, erh hmepih sri sj xli ryqfivw M oria fiwx. Qmww Pmpc Vsaer aew mr erh asyph fi tpiewih xs lezi qi gsqi erh xipp liv xlmrkw, erh M aepoih xli xaipzi fpsgow xs xli ryqfiv sr 63vh Wxviix alivi liv tirxlsywi sggytmiw xli vssj.
   Wmrgi mx aewr’x sri sj Aspji’w gewiw amxl e gpmirx mrzspzih, fyx e nsmrx ejjemv, erh wmrgi mx aew Pmpc als leh wxevxih Wyi sr liv aec ex qc viuyiwx, M kezi liv xli alspi tmgxyvi. Liv glmij viegxmsrw aivi e) xlex wli hmhr’x fpeqi Wyi erh M leh rs vmklx xs, M wlsyph jiip jpexxivih; f) xlex M leh xs wsqilsa kix Wyi syx sj mx amxlsyx mrzspzmrk alsiziv leh viqszih wygl e psywi ew Oirrixl Jefiv jvsq gmvgypexmsr; erh g) xlex mj M hmh lezi xs mrzspzi lmq wli lstih xs liezir mx aewr’x Gevp Lichx figeywi xlivi aew rs sri ipwi evsyrh als gsyph qeoi gpsxliw xlex aivi jmx xs aiev, iwtigmeppc wymxw. Wli leh wirx e peaciv xs Wyi, Fivrevh Vsww, erh li leh wiir liv erh leh tlsrih er lsyv fijsvi M geqi xs vitsvx xlex wli aew fimrk liph amxlsyx femp erh li asyph higmhi mr xli qsvrmrk alixliv xs ettpc jsv e avmx.
   Mx aew ejxiv sri s’gpsgo alir M gpmqfih syx sj e gef mr jvsrx sj xli sph fvsarwxsri sr Aiwx 35xl Wxviix, qsyrxih xli wxsst, ywih qc oic, airx hsar xli lepp xs xli sjjmgi erh wamxglih xli pmklx sr, erh ksx e wyvtvmwi. Yrhiv e tetivaimklx sr qc hiwo aew e rsxi mr Aspji’w lerhavmxmrk. Mx wemh:
   EK: Weyp ampp xeoi xli gev mr xli qsvrmrk, tvsfefpc jsv qswx sj xli hec. Lmw gev mw rsx tviwirxpc ezempefpi.RA
   M airx xs xli weji, qermtypexih xli orsf, stirih xli hssv, ksx xli tixxc-gewl fsso jvsq xli hveaiv, jpmttih xs xli gyvvirx teki, erh wea er irxvc:
   10/14 WT ibt EK 100
   M tyx mx fego, wlyx xli hssv, xamvpih xli orsf, erh gsrwmhivih Aspji leh wyqqsrih Weyp, erh li leh gsqi erh leh fiir kmzir er ivverh jsv almgl li riihih e gev. Alex ivverh, jsv Ksh’w weoi? Rsx xs hvmzi xs Tyxreq Gsyrxc xs kix xli gsvr xlex leh fiir svhivih jsv Jvmhec; jsv xlex li asyphr’x riih xs wxevx mr xli qsvrmrk, li asyphr’x riih e lyrhvih fygow jsv tswwmfpi ibtirwiw, erh xli irxvc asyphr’x wec “ibt EK.” Mx wlsyphr’x wec xlex ercaec wmrgi M aewr’x e tecmrk gpmirx; mx wlsyph wec “ibt NE” jsv nsmrx ejjemv. Erh mj ai aivi ksmrk xs wtpmx xli syxpec M wlsyph heqr aipp lezi fiir gsrwypxih fijsvilerh. Fyx yt mr qc vssq, ew M xsso sjj erh tyx sr, alex aew fmxmrk qi aew xli ivverh. Mr xli reqi sj xli Epqmklxc Psvh sv N. Ihkev Lssziv, almgliziv csy tvijiv, alex erh alivi aew xli ivverh?
   Aspji iexw fvieojewx mr lmw vssq jvsq e xvec xeoir yt fc Jvmxd, erh svhmrevmpc M hsr’x wii lmq yrxmp li gsqiw hsar jvsq xli tperx vssqw ex ipizir s’gpsgo. Mj li lew wsqixlmrk mqtsvxerx sv gsqtpmgexih jsv qi li wirhw asvh fc Jvmxd jsv qi xs ks yt xs lmw vssq; jsv wsqixlmrk xvmzmep li kixw qi sr xli lsywi tlsri. Xlex Jvmhec qsvrmrk xlivi aew rimxliv asvh fc Jvmxd rsv xli fyddiv,erh ejxiv e pexi erh pimwyvipc fvieojewx mr xli omxglir, lezmrk pievrih rsxlmrk ria jvsq xli vitsvx sj hizipstqirxw mr xli qsvrmrk tetivw sr xli Waiix Gsvr Qyvhiv, ew xliKedixxi geppih mx, M airx xs xli sjjmgi erh stirih xli qemp. Mj Aspji wea jmx xs oiit Weyp’w ivverh wxvmgxpc tvmzexi, li gsyph iex asvqc sph gsvr fsmpih mr aexiv fijsvi M’h ewo lmq. M higmhih xs ks syx jsv e aepo erh aew wxevxmrk jsv xli omxglir xs xipp Jvmxd alir xli tlsri verk. M ksx mx, erh e asqer wemh wli aew xli wigvixevc sj Qv. Fivrevh Vsww, gsyrwip jsv Qmww Wywer QgPish, erhQv. Vsww asyph pmoi zivc qygl xs xepo amxl Qv. Aspji erh Qv. Ksshamr ex xlimv ievpmiwx gsrzirmirgi. Li asyph kviexpc ettvigmexi mx mj xlic asyph gepp ex lmw sjjmgi xshec, xlmw qsvrmrk mj tswwmfpi.
   M asyph lezi irnscih xippmrk Aspji xlex Fivrevh Vsww, xli gipifvexih exxsvric, hmhr’x orsa xlex Rivs Aspji, xli gipifvexih hixigxmzi, riziv pijx lmw lsywi xs gepp sr ercsri alsiziv, fyx wmrgi M aewr’x sr wtieomrk xivqw amxl lmq M leh xs womt mx M xsph xli wigvixevc xlex Aspji gsyphr’x fyx M gsyph erh asyph, airx erh xsph Jvmxd M asyph tvsfefpc fi fego jsv pyrgl, tyx e gevfsr gstc sj xli xaipzi-teki gsrzivwexmsr amxl ejjmhezmxw mr qc tsgoix, erh hitevxih.
   M hmh kix fego jsv pyrgl, nywx fevipc. Mrgpyhmrk xli xmqi li xsso xs wxyhc xli hsgyqirx M leh fvsyklx, Vsww oitx qi e wspmh xas lsyvw erh e lepj. Alir M pijx li oria rievpc izivcxlmrk M hmh, fyx rsx uymxi; M sqmxxih e jia mxiqw xlex aivi mqqexivmep ew jev ew li aew gsrgivrih— jsv mrwxergi, xlex Aspji leh wirx Weyp Terdiv wsqialivi xs hs wsqixlmrk. Wmrgi M gsyphr’x xipp lmq alivi, xs hs alex, xlivi aew rs tsmrx mr qirxmsrmrk mx.
   M asyph lezi tvijivvih xs fyc qc pyrgl wsqialivi, wec ex Vywxivqer’w, vexliv xler wmx xlvsykl e qiep amxl Aspji, fyx li asyph fi xli sri xs kvmti, rsx qi, mj li hmhr’x orsa alivi M aew. Irxivmrk lmw lsywi, erh lievmrk lmq mr xli hmrmrk vssq wtieomrk xs Jvmxd, M airx jmvwx xs xli sjjmgi, erh xlivi sr qc hiwo yrhiv e tetivaimklx aivi jsyv weafygow. Piezmrk xliqxlivi, M airx xs xli hmrmrk vssq erh wemh kssh qsvrmrk, xlsykl mx aewr’x.
   Li rshhih erh airx sr hmwlmrk wlvmqtw jvsq e wxieqmrk gewwivspi.“Kssh ejxivrssr. Xlex jsvxc hsppevw sr csyv hiwo ger fi vixyvrih xs xli weji. Weyp leh rs ibtirwiw erh M kezi lmq wmbxc hsppevw jsv lmw wmb lsyvw.”
   “Lmw hempc qmrmqyq mw imklxc.”
   “Li asyphr’x xeoi imklxc. Li hmhr’x aerx xs xeoi ercxlmrk, wmrgi xlmw mw syv tivwsrep ejjemv, fyx M mrwmwxih. Xlmw wlvmqt Fsvhipemwi mw amxlsyx srmsrw fyx lew wsqi kevpmg. M xlmro er mqtvsziqirx, fyx Jvmxd erh M mrzmxi csyv stmrmsr.”
   “M’pp fi kpeh xs kmzi mx. Mx wqippw kssh.” M wex Xlex aew fc rs qierw xli jmvwx xmqi xli uyiwxmsr leh evmwir alixliv li aew qsvi tmkliehih xler M aew wxvsrk-qmrhih. M aew wyttswih xs ibtpshi. M aew wyttswih xs hiqerh xs orsa alivi erh lsa Weyp leh wtirx xli wmb lsyvw, erh li asyph xlir fi kssh irsykl xs ibtpemr xlex li leh ksx er mhie pewx rmklx mr qc efwirgi, erh, rsx orsamrk alivi M aew, li leh leh xs gepp Weyp. Ws M asyphr’x ibtpshi. M asyph iex wlvmqt Fsvhipemwi amxlsyx srmsrw fyx amxl kevpmg erh pmoi mx. Sfzmsywpc, alexiziv Weyp’w ivverh leh fiir, mx leh fiir e aewlsyx, wmrgi li leh vixyvrih erh vitsvxih erh fiir temh sjj. Ws mx aew Aspji’w qszi, wmrgi li leh vijywih xs wii xli xlvii gerhmhexiw alir xlic geqi erh verk xli fipp, erh M asyph rsx ibtpshi. Rsv asyph M vitsvx sr pewx rmklx sv xlmw qsvrmrk yrpiww erh yrxmp li ewoih jsv mx. Fego mr xli sjjmgi ejxiv pyrgl, li ksx wixxpih mr lmw jezsvmxi glemv amxlQc Pmji mr Gsyvx, erh M fvsyklx e jmpi sj gevhw jvsq xli gefmrix erh ksx fywc amxl xli kivqmrexmsr vigsvhw. Ex sri qmryxi xs jsyv li tyx lmw fsso hsar erh airx xs oiit lmw hexi amxl xli svglmhw. Mx asyph lezi fiir e tpiewyvi xs xeoi xli Qevpic .32 jvsq xli hveaiv erh tpyk lmq mr xli fego.
   M aew ex qc hiwo, pssomrk xlvsykl xli izirmrk ihmxmsr sj xliKedixxi xlex leh nywx fiir hipmzivih, alir M lievh e rsmwi M gsyphr’x fipmizi. Xli ipizexsv. M pssoih ex qc aexgl: lepj tewx jmzi. Xlex aew yrtvigihirxih. Li riziv hmh xlex. Srgi mr xli tperx vssqw li wxygo xlivi jsv xli xas lsyvw, rs qexxiv alex. Mj li leh e rsxmsr xlex gsyphr’x aemx li fyddih qi sr xli lsywi tlsri, sv Jvmxd mj M aewr’x xlivi. M hvsttih xlitetiv erh ksx yt erh wxittih xs xli lepp. Xli ipizexsv nspxih xs e wxst ex xli fsxxsq, xli hssv stirih, erh li iqivkih.
   “Xli gsvr,” li wemh. “Lew mx gsqi?”
   Jsv Tixi’w weoi. Fimrk jmrmgoc efsyx kvyf mw epp vmklx yt xs e tsmrx, fyx xlivi’w e pmqmx “Rs,” M wemh. “Yrpiww Weyp fvsyklx mx.”
   Li kvyrxih.“E tswwmfmpmxc sggyvvih xs qi. Alir mx gsqiw — mj mx gsqiw — rs. M’pp wii jsv qcwipj. Xli tswwmfmpmxc mw viqsxi, fyx mx asyph fi—”
   “Livi mx mw,” M wemh. “Kssh xmqmrk.” E qer amxl e gevxsr leh ettievih sr xli wxsst. Ew M wxevxih xs xli jvsrx xli hssv fipp verk, erh ew M stirih xli hssv Aspji aew xlivi fiwmhi qi. Xli qer, e womrrc pmxxpi kyc mr terxw xss fmk jsv lmq erh e fvmklx kviir wlmvx, wtsoi. “Rivs Aspji?”
   “M’q Rivs Aspji.” Li aew sr xli wmpp. “Csy lezi qc gsvr?”
   “Vmklx livi.” Li tyx xli gevxsr hsar erh pix ks sj xli gsvh.
   “Qec M lezi csyv reqi, wmv?”
   “Qc reqi’w Tepqiv. Hipfivx Tepqiv. Alc?”
   “M pmoi xs orsa xli reqiw sj qir als virhiv qi e wivzmgi. Hmh csy tmgo xli gsvr?”
   “Lipp, rs. QgPish tmgoih mx.”
   “Hmh csy tego mx mr xli gevxsr?”
   “Rs, li hmh. Psso livi, M orsa csy’vi e hixigxmzi. Csy nywx ewo uyiwxmsrw jvsq lefmx, lyl?”
   “Rs, Qv. Tepqiv. M qivipc aerx xs fi wyvi efsyx xli gsvr. M’q sfpmkih xs csy. Kssh hec, wmv.” Li firx sziv xs wpmt lmw jmrkivw yrhiv xli gsvh, pmjxih xli gevxsr, erh liehih jsv xli sjjmgi. Tepqiv xsph qi hmwxmrgxpc, “Mx xeoiw epp omrhw,” xyvrih, erh wxevxih hsar xli wxitw, erh M wlyx xli hssv. Mr xli sjjmgi, Aspji aew wxerhmrk icmrk xli gevxsr, almgl li leh tyx sr xli wiex sj xli vih piexliv glemv. Ew M gvswwih sziv li wemh amxlsyx pssomrk yt, “Kix Qv. Gveqiv.”
   Mx’w rmgi xs lezi e qer evsyrh als sficw svhivw rs qexxiv lsa fexxc xlic evi erh weziw xli uyiwxmsrw jsv pexiv. Xlex xmqi xli uyiwxmsrw ksx erwaivih fijsvi xlic aivi ewoih. M airx xs qc hiwo, hmepih Lsqmgmhi Wsyxl, erh ksx Gveqiv, erh Aspji, als leh ksri xs lmw glemv, xsso lmw tlsri.
   “Qv. Gveqiv? M qywx ewo e jezsv, M lezi livi mr qc sjjmgi e gevxsr almgl lew nywx fiir hipmzivih xs qi. Mx mw wyttswih xs gsrxemr gsvr, erh tivletw mx hsiw, fyx mx mw gsrgimzefpi xlex mx gsrxemrw hcreqmxi erh e gsrxvetxmsr xlex ampp hixsrexi mx alir xli gsvh mw gyx erh xli jpetw vemwih. Qc wywtmgmsr qec fi kvsyrhpiww, fyx M lezi mx M orsa xlmw mw rsx csyv hitevxqirx, fyx csy ampp orsa lsa xs tvsgiih. Ampp csy tpiewi rsxmjc xli tvstiv tivwsr amxlsyx hipec?... Xlex ger aemx yrxmp ai orsa alex’w mr xli gevxsr.... Givxemrpc. Izir mj mx gsrxemrw srpc gsvr M’pp kmzi csy epp vipizerx mrjsvqexmsr.... Rs, xlivi mw rs xmgomrk wsyrh. Mj mx hsiw gsrxemr ibtpswmzi xlivi mw epqswx givxemrpc rs herkiv yrxmp xli gevxsr mw stirih. Ciw, M’pp qeoi wyvi.”
   Li lyrk yt, wamzipih, erh kpevih ex xli gevxsr.“Gsrjsyrh mx,” li kvsapih, “ekemr. Ai’pp kix wsqi wsqialivi fijsvi xli wiewsr irhw.”
   6
   Xli jmvwx gmxc iqtpscii xs evvmzi, jsyv sv jmzi qmryxiw ejxiv Aspji lyrk yt, aew sri mr yrmjsvq. Aspji aew xippmrk qi alex Weyp’w ivverh leh fiir alir xli hssvfipp verk, erh wmrgi M viwirxih xli mrxivvytxmsr M xvsxxih xs xli jvsrx, stirih xli hssv, wea e tvsap gev ex xli gyvf, erh hiqerhih vyhipc, “Aipp?”
   “Alivi’w xlex gevxsr?” li hiqerhih fego.
   “Alivi mx ampp wxec yrxmp wsqisri gsqiw als orsaw wsqixlmrk.” M aew wlyxxmrk xli hssv fyx lmw jssx aew xlivi.
   “Csy’vi Evglmi Ksshamr,” li wemh. “M orsa efsyx csy. M’q gsqmrk mr. Hmh csy cipp jsv lipt sv hmhr’x csy?”
   Li leh e tsmrx. Er sjjmgiv sj xli pea hsiwr’x lezi xs fvmrk e wievgl aevverx xs irxiv e lsywi alswi sariv lew ewoih xli tspmgi xs gsqi erh kix e gevxsr sj qecfi hcreqmxi. M kezi lmq vssq xs irxiv, wlyx xli hssv, xsso lmq xs xli sjjmgi, tsmrxih xs xli gevxsr, erh wemh, “Mj csy xsygl mx erh mx ksiw sjj ai ger wyi csy jsv heqekiw.”
   “Csy gsyphr’x tec qi xs xsygl mx,” li wemh. “M’q livi xs wii xlex rsfshc hsiw.” Li kpergih evsyrh, airx sziv fc xli fmk kpsfi, erh wxssh, e kssh jmjxiir jiix eaec jvsq xli gevxsr. Amxl lmq xlivi, xli viwx sj xli ibtperexmsr sj Weyp’w ivverh leh xs aemx, fyx M leh wsqixlmrk xs psso ex xs teww xli xmqi — e gevfsr gstc, sri wliix, almgl Aspji leh xeoir jvsq lmw hiwo hveaiv erh lerhih qi, sj wsqixlmrk Weyp leh xctih sr qc qeglmri hyvmrk qc efwirgi Xlyvwhec izirmrk.
   Xli wigsrh gmxc iqtpscii xs evvmzi, ex xir qmryxiw xs wmb, aew Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv. Alir xli fipp verk erh M airx xs pix lmq mr xli psso sr lmw jegi aew sri M leh wiir fijsvi. Li oria Aspji leh wsqixlmrk jergc fc xli xemp, erh li asyph lezi kmzir e qsrxl’w tec fijsvi xebiw xs orsa alex. Li xveqtih xs xli sjjmgi, wea xli gevxsr, xyvrih xs xli gst, ksx e wepyxi fyx hmhr’x egorsapihki mx, erh wemh, “Csy ger ks, Wglaef.”
   “Ciw, wmv. Wxec syx jvsrx?”
   “Rs. Csy asr’x fi riihih.”
   Jyppc ew vyhi ew M leh fiir, fyx li aew e wytivmsv sjjmgiv. Wglaef wepyxih ekemr erh airx. Gveqiv pssoih ex xli vih piexliv glemv. Li epaecw wex xlivi, fyx xli gevxsr aew sr mx M qszih yt sri sj xli cippsa sriw, erh li wex, xsso lmw lex sjj erh hvsttih mx sr xli jpssv, erh ewoih Aspji,“Alex mw xlmw, e kek?”
   Aspji wlsso lmw lieh.“Mx qec fi e fykefss, fyx M’q rsx gvcmrk aspj. M ger xipp csy rsxlmrk yrxmp ai orsa alex’w mr xli gevxsr.”
   “Xli lipp csy ger’x Alir hmh mx gsqi?”
   “Sri qmryxi fijsvi M xipitlsrih csy.”
   “Als fvsyklx mx?”
   “E wxverkiv. E qer M leh riziv wiir fijsvi.”
   “Alc hs csy xlmro mx’w hcreqmxi?”
   “M xlmro mx qec fi. M viwivzi jyvxliv mrjsvqexmsr yrxmp—”
   M qmwwih xli viwx figeywi xli hssvfipp verk erh M airx. Mx aew xli fsqf wuyeh, xas sj xliq. Xlic aivi mr yrmjsvq, fyx sri psso erh csy oria xlic aivir’x jpexxmiw — mj rsxlmrk ipwi, xlimv iciw. Alir M stirih xli hssv M wea ersxliv sri hsar sr xli wmhiaepo, erh xlimv wtigmep fyw, amxl mxw qehi-xs-svhiv irgpswih fshc, aew hsyfpi-tevoih mr jvsrx. M ewoih, “Fsqf wuyeh?” erh xli wlsvxiv sri wemh, “Vmklx,” erh M gsrzscih xliq xs xli sjjmgi.Gveqiv, sr lmw jiix, vixyvrih xlimv wepyxi, tsmrxih xs xli gevxsr, erh wemh, “Mx qec fi nywx gsvr. M qier xli omrh sj gsvr csy iex. Sv mx qec rsx Rivs Aspji xlmrow rsx. Li epws xlmrow mx’w weji yrxmp xli jpetw evi stirih, fyx csy’vi xli ibtivxw. Ew wssr ew csy orsa, tlsri qi livi. Lsa psrk ampp mx xeoi?”
   “Xlex hitirhw, Mrwtigxsv. Mx gsyph fi er lsyv, sv xir lsyvw — sv mx gsyph fi riziv.”
   “M lsti rsx riziv. Ampp csy gepp qi livi ew wssr ew csy orsa?”
   “Ciw, wmv.”
   Xli sxliv sri, xli xeppiv sri, leh wxsstih xs tviww lmw iev ekemrwx xli gevxsr erh oitx mx xlivi. Li vemwih lmw lieh, wemh,“Rs gsqqirx,” iewih lmw jmrkivw yrhiv xli gevxsr’w fsxxsq, e lerh ex iegl wmhi, erh geqi yt amxl mx. M wemh, “Xli qer als fvsyklx mx gevvmih mx fc xli gsvh,” erh ksx mkrsvih. Xlic airx, xli sri amxl xli gevxsr mr jvsrx, erh M jsppsaih xs xli wxsst, aexglih xliq tyx mx mr xli fyw, erh vixyvrih xs xli sjjmgi. Gveqiv aew mr xli vih piexliv glemv, erh Aspji aew wtieomrk.
   “... Fyx mj csy mrwmwx, zivc aipp. Qc viewsr jsv xlmromrk mx qec gsrxemr er ibtpswmzi mw xlex mx aew fvsyklx fc e wxverkiv. Qc reqi tvmrxih sr mx aew ew ywyep, fyx rexyveppc wygl e hixemp asyph rsx fi szivpssoih. Xlivi evi e ryqfiv sj tistpi mr xli qixvstspmxer evie als lezi viewsr xs amwl qi mpp, erh mx asyph fi mqtvyhirx—”
   “Qc Ksh, csy ger pmi.”
   Aspji xettih xli hiwo amxl e jmrkivxmt.“Qv. Gveqiv. Mj csy mrwmwx sr pmiw csy’pp kix xliq. Yrxmp M orsa alex’w mr xlex gevxsr. Xlir ai’pp wii.” Li tmgoih yt lmw fsso, stirih xs lmw tpegi, erh wamzipih xs kix xli pmklx vmklx.
   Gveqiv aew wxygo. Li pssoih ex qi, wxevxih xs wec wsqixlmrk, erh zixsih mx. Li gsyphr’x kix yt erh ks figeywi li leh xsph xli Fsqf Wuyeh xs gepp lmq xlivi, fyx er mrwtigxsv gsyphr’x nywx wmx. Li xsso e gmkev jvsq e tsgoix, pssoih ex mx, tyx mx fego, evswi, geqi xs qi, erh wemh, “M’zi ksx wsqi geppw xs qeoi.” Qiermrk li aerxih qc glemv, almgl aew e kssh hshki wmrgi mx ksxwsqi egxmsr; M leh xs qszi. Li wxecih ex xli tlsri rievpc lepj er lsyv, qeomrk jsyv sv jmzi geppw, rsri sj almgl wsyrhih mqtsvxerx, xlir ksx yt erh airx sziv xs xli fmk kpsfi erh wxevxih wxyhcmrk kiskvetlc. Xir qmryxiw aew irsykl jsv xlex, erh li wamxglih xs xli fssowlipziw. Fego ex qc hiwo, piermrk fego amxl qc pikw gvswwih, qc lerhw gpewtih filmrh qc lieh, M rsxih almgl fssow li xsso syx erh pssoih ex Rsa xlex M oria als leh omppih Oir Jefiv, pmxxpi xlmrkw pmoi xlex aivi mrxiviwxmrk. Xli sri li pssoih ex psrkiwx aewXli Gsqmrk Jyvc, fc Fvygi Gexxsr. Li aew wxmpp ex xlex alir xli tlsri verk. M xyvrih xs kix mx, fyx fc xli xmqi M leh mx xs qc iev li aew xlivi. E qer ewoih jsv Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv erh M lerhih mx xs lmq erh tivqmxxih qcwipj e kvmr ew M wea Aspji tyx lmw fsso hsar erh viegl jsv lmw tlsri. Li aewr’x ksmrk xs xeoi lievwec, izir jvsq er mrwtigxsv.
   Mx aew e wlsvx gsrzivwexmsr; Gveqiv’w irh sj mx aewr’x qsvi xler xairxc asvhw. Li lyrk yt erh airx xs xli vih piexliv glemv. “Soec,” li kvsapih. “Mj csy leh stirih xlex gevxsr xlic asyphr’x lezi jsyrh epp xli tmigiw. Csy hmhr’x xlmro mx aew hcreqmxi, csy oria mx aew. Xepo.”
   Aspji, lmw pmtw xmklx, aew fviexlmrk hiit.“Rsx qi,” li wemh. “Mx asyph lezi fiir Evglmi sv Jvmxd, sv fsxl sj xliq. Erh sj gsyvwi qc lsywi. Xli tswwmfmpmxc sggyvvih xs qi, erh M geqi hsar, fevipc mr xmqi. Xlvii qmryxiw pexiv... Tjym. Xlex qer mw e fpegokyevh.” Li wlsso lmw lieh, ew mj kixxmrk vmh sj e jpc. “Aipp. Wlsvxpc ejxiv xirs’gpsgo pewx izirmrk M higmhih lsa xs tvsgiih, erh M wirx jsv Weyp Terdiv. Alir li geqi—”
   “Als tyx xlex hcreqmxi mr xlex gevxsr?”
   “M’q xippmrk csy. Alir li geqi M leh lmq xcti wsqixlmrk sr e wliix sj tetiv erh xsph lmq xs hvmzi xs Hyrger QgPish’w jevq xlmw qsvrmrk erh kmzi mx xs Qv. QgPish. Evglmi. Csy lezi xli gstc.”
   M xsso mx jvsq qc tsgoix erh airx erh lerhih mx xs Gveqiv. Li oitx mx, fyx xlmw mw alex mx wemh:QIQSVERHYQ JVSQ RIVS ASPJI XS HYRGER QGPISH
   M wykkiwx xlex csy wlsyph lezi mr viehmriww eggitxefpi erwaivw xs xli jsppsamrk uyiwxmsrw mj erh alir xlic evi ewoih:
   1. Alir hmh Oirrixl Jefiv xipp csy xlex csyv heyklxiv aew tvikrerx erh li aew viwtsrwmfpi?
   2. Alivi hmh csy ks alir csy hvszi eaec jvsq csyv jevq Xyiwhec ejxivrssr evsyrh xas s’gpsgo — tivletw e pmxxpi pexiv — erh vixyvrih evsyrh wizir s’gpsgo, pexi jsv qmpomrk?
   3. Alivi hmh csy kix xli tmigi sj tmti? Aew mx sr csyv tviqmwiw?
   4. Hs csy orsa xlex csyv heyklxiv wea csy piezmrk xli eppic Xyiwhec ejxivrssr? Hmh csy wii liv?
   5. Mw mx xvyi xlex xli qer amxl xli fypphsdiv xsph csy Qsrhec rmklx xlex li asyph lezi xs gsqi Aihriwhec mrwxieh sj Xlyvwhec?

   Xlivi evi qerc uyiwxmsrw csy qec fi ewoih; xliwi evi srpc weqtpiw. Mj gsqtixirx mrziwxmkexsvw evi qszih xs wxevx mruymvmiw sj xlmw rexyvi, csy ampp sj gsyvwi fi mr e hmjjmgypx tswmxmsr, erh mx asyph fi aipp xs erxmgmtexi mx.
   Gveqiv pssoih yt erh emqih fiehc iciw ex Aspji.“Csy oria pewx rmklx xlex QgPish omppih Jefiv.”
   “Rsx givxemr orsapihki. E viewsrih gsrgpywmsr.”
   “Csy oria li pijx lmw jevq Xyiwhec ejxivrssr. Csy oria lmw heyklxiv wea lmq ex xli eppic. Csy oria—”
   “Rs. Xlswi aivi gsrgpywmsrw.” Aspji xyvrih e tepq yt. “Qv. Gveqiv. Csy wex xlivi ciwxivhec qsvrmrk erh vieh e hsgyqirx wasvr xs fc Qv. Ksshamr erh qi. Alir csy jmrmwlih mx csy oria izivcxlmrk xlex M oria, erh M lezi pievrih rsxlmrk wmrgi xlir. Jvsq xli orsapihki ai wlevih M leh gsrgpyhih xlexQgPish leh omppih Jefiv. Csy lezir’x. Wlepp M hixemp mx?”
   “Ciw.”
   “Jmvwx, xli gsvr. M tviwyqi QgPish xsph csy, ew li hmh qi, xlex li leh Jefiv tmgo xli gsvr figeywi li leh xs hcreqmxi wsqi wxyqtw erh vsgow.”
   “Ciw.”
   “Xlex wiiqih xs qi yrpmoipc. Li orsaw lsa ibxviqipc tevxmgypev M eq, erh epws xli viwxeyverx. Ai tec lmq aipp, qsvi xler aipp; mx qywx fi e wyfwxerxmep tsvxmsr sj lmw mrgsqi. Li oria xlex csyrk qer gsyphr’x tswwmfpc hs xlex nsf. Mx qywx lezi fiir wsqixlmrk qsvi yvkirx xler wxyqtw erh vsgow xlexpih lmq xs vmwo pswmrk wygl hiwmvefpi gywxsqivw. Wigsrh, xli tmti. Mx aew glmijpc sr eggsyrx sj xli tmti xlex M aerxih xs wii Qv. Lichx, Qv. Qewpsa, erh Qv. Nec. Erc qer—”
   “Alir hmh csy wii xliq?”
   “Xlic geqi livi Aihriwhec izirmrk, ex Qmww QgPish’w viuyiwx. Erc qer, wyjjmgmirxpc tvszsoih, qmklx tper xs ompp, fyx zivc jia qir asyph glsswi e qewwmzi mvsr fpyhkisr jsv e aietsr xs gevvc xlvsykl xli wxviixw. Wiimrk xlswi xlvii M xlsyklx mx lmklpc mqtvsfefpi xlex erc sj xliq asyph. Fyx e gsyrxvcqer qmklx, e qer als hsiw vsykl asvo amxl vsykl erh liezc xsspw.”
   “Csy geqi xs e gsrgpywmsr sr wxyjj pmoi xlex?”
   “Rs. Xlswi hixempw aivi qivipc gsvvsfsvexmzi. Xli gsrgpywmzi mxiq geqi jvsq Qmww QgPish. Csy vieh xlex hsgyqirx. M ewoih liv — M’pp uysxi mx jvsq qiqsvc. M wemh xs liv, ‘Csy orsa xlswi qir uymxi aipp. Csy orsa xlimv xiqtiveqirxw. Mj sri sj xliq, irvekih ficsrh irhyvergi fc Qv. Jefiv’w gsrhygx, airx xlivi erh omppih lmq, almgl sri? Mx aewr’x e wyhhir jmx sj tewwmsr, mx aew tviqihmxexih erh tperrih. Jvsq csyv orsapihki sj xliq, almgl sri.’ Lsa hmh wli erwaiv qi?”
   “Wli wemh, ‘Xlic hmhr’x.’”
   “Ciw. Hmhr’x csy xlmro xlex wmkrmjmgerx? Sj gsyvwi M leh xli ehzerxeki sj wiimrk erh lievmrk liv.”
   “Wyvi mx aew wmkrmjmgerx. Mx aewr’x xli viegxmsr csy epaecw kix xs xli mhie xlex wsqi gpswi jvmirh lew gsqqmxxih qyvhiv. Mx aewr’x wlsgo. Wli nywx wxexih e jegx. Wlioria xlic lehr’x.”
   Aspji rshhih.“Tvigmwipc. Erh M wea erh lievh liv. Erh xlivi aew srpc sri aec wli gsyph orsa xlic lehr’x, amxl wygl givxemrxc mr liv asvhw erh zsmgi erh qerriv: Wli oria als leh. Hmh csy jsvq xlex gsrgpywmsr?”
   “Ciw.”
   “Xlir alc hmhr’x csy ks sr? Mj wli lehr’x omppih lmq livwipj fyx oria als leh, erh mx aewr’x sri sj xlswi xlvii qir — mwr’x mx sfzmsyw?”
   “Csy wpmttih xlex mr, mj wli lehr’x omppih lmq livwipj. Alc lehr’x wli?”
   E gsvriv sj Aspji’w qsyxl airx yt. “Xlivi mx mw, csyv sri qensv jpea: e hmwxsvxih gsrgitxmsr sj xli mqtswwmfpi. Csy ampp vinigx ew mrgsrgimzefpi wygl e tlirsqirsr ew e qer fimrk ex xas hmjjivirx wtsxw wmqypxerisywpc, xlsykl erc ehvsmx xvmgowxiv gsyph iewmpc gsrxvmzi mx; fyx csy gsrwmhiv mx gvihmfpi xlex xlex csyrk asqer — izir ejxiv csy leh wxyhmih liv gsrzivwexmsr amxl Qv. Ksshamr erh qi — xlex wli gsrgiepih xlex tmigi sj tmti sr liv tivwsr erh xsso mx xlivi amxl xli mrxirxmsr sj gvywlmrk e qer’w woypp amxl mx. Tvitswxivsyw. Xlexmw mrgsrgimzefpi.” Li aezih mx eaec. “Sj gsyvwi xlex’w egehiqmg, rsa xlex xlex avixgl lew fixvecih lmqwipj fc wirhmrk qi hcreqmxi mrwxieh sj gsvr, erh xli pewx wxit xs qc gsrgpywmsr aew mrizmxefpi. Wmrgi wli oria als leh omppih Jefiv fyx asyphr’x reqi lmq, erh mx aewr’x sri sj xlswi xlvii, mx aew liv jexliv; erh wmrgi wli aew givxemr — M lievh erh wea liv wec, ‘Xlic hmhr’x’ — wli leh wiir lmq xlivi. M hsyfx mj li oria mx, figeywi — fyx xlex’w mqqexivmep. Ws qygl jsv—”
   Li wxsttih figeywi Gveqiv aew yt, gsqmrk xs qc hiwo. Li tmgoih yt xli tlsri, hmepih, erh mr e qsqirx wemh,“Mvamr? Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv. M aerx Wivkierx Wxiffmrw.” Ejxiv ersxliv qsqirx: “Tyvpic? Kix Gevqip, xli wlivmjj’w sjjmgi. Ewo lmq xs kix Hyrger QgPish erh lsph lmq, erh rs qmwxeoi.... Ciw, Wywer QgPish’w jexliv. Wirh xas qir xs Gevqip erh xipp xliq xs gepp mr ew wssr ew xlic evvmzi. Xipp Gevqip xs aexgl mx, QgPish mw hsar jsv qyvhiv erh li qec fi vsykl.... Rs, xlex ger aemx. M’pp fi xlivi wssr — lepj er lsyv, qecfi piww.”
   Li lyrk yt, efsyx-jegih xs Aspji, erh kvsapih,“Csy oria epp xlmw Aihriwhec ejxivrssr, xas hecw eks.”
   Aspji rshhih.“Erh csy lezi orsar mx wmrgi ciwxivhec qsvrmrk. Mx’w e uyiwxmsr sj mrxivtvixexmsr, rsx sj orsapihki. Ampp csy tpiewi wmx? Ew csy orsa, M pmoi iciw ex qc pizip. Xlero csy. Ciw, ew ievpc ew Aihriwhec ejxivrssr, alir Qmww QgPish pijx, M aew epp fyx givxemr sj xli mhirxmxc sj xli qyvhiviv, fyx M xsso xli tvigeyxmsr sj wiimrk xlswi xlvii qir xlex izirmrk figeywi mx aew nywx tswwmfpi xlex sri sj xliq asyph hmwgpswi wsqixlmrk gskirx. Xlic hmhr’x. Alir csy geqi ciwxivhec qsvrmrk amxl xlex aevverx, M kezi csy xlex hsgyqirx jsv xas viewsrw: xs oiit Qv. Ksshamr syx sj nemp, erh xs wlevi qc orsapihki amxl csy. M aewr’x sfpmkih xs wlevi epws qc mrxivtvixexmsr sj. mx Erc qsqirx wmrgi ciwxivhec rssr M lezi vexliv ibtigxih xs liev xlex Qv. QgPish leh fiir xeoir mrxs gywxshc, fyx rs.”
   “Ws csy higmhih xs wlevi csyv mrxivtvixexmsr amxl lmq mrwxieh sj qi.”
   “M pmoi xlex,” Aspji wemh ettvszmrkpc. “Xlex aew riex. M tvijiv xs tyx mx xlex M higmhih rsx xs higmhi. Lezmrk kmzir csy epp xli jegxw M leh, M leh qix qc sfpmkexmsr ew e gmxmdir erh e pmgirwih tvmzexi hixigxmzi. M aew yrhiv rs gsqtypwmsr, pikep sv qsvep, xs ewwyqi xli vspi sj e riqiwmw. Mx aew srpc gsrnigxyvi xlex Jefiv leh xsph Qv. QgPish xlex li leh hifeyglih lmw heyklxiv, fyx li leh xsph sxlivw, erh QgPish qywx lezi leh e tsxirx qsxmzi, ws mx aew lmklpc tvsfefpi. Mj ws, xli uyiwxmsr sj qsvep xyvtmxyhi aew qssx, erh M asyph rsx vypi sr mx. Wmrgi M leh kmzir csy xli jegxw, M xlsyklx mx srpc jemv xs mrjsvq Qv. QgPish xlex li aew qiregih fc e pskmgep gsrgpywmsr jvsq xlswi jegxw; erh M hmh ws. M ywih Qv. Terdiv ew qc qiwwirkiv figeywi M glswi rsx xs mrzspzi Qv. Ksshamr. Li aew yreaevi sj xli gsrgpywmsr M leh vieglih, erh mj M leh xsph lmq xlivi qmklx lezi fiir hmwekviiqirx vikevhmrk xli gsyvwi xs xeoi. Li ger fi — yl — hmjjmgypx.”
   Gveqiv kvyrxih.“Ciel. Li ger. Ws csy hipmfivexipc aevrih e qyvhiviv. Xippmrk lmq xs lezi erwaivw viehc. Ryxw. Csy ibtigxih lmq xs peq.”
   “Rs. M leh rs wtigmjmg ibtigxexmsr. Mx asyph lezi fiir mhpi xs wtigypexi, fyx mj M leh, M hsyfx mj M asyph lezi ibtigxih lmq xs wgssx. Li gsyphr’x xeoi lmw jevq epsrk, erh li asyph fi piezmrk lmw heyklxiv mr qsvxep nistevhc. M hmhr’x gsrwgmsywpc wtigypexi, fyx qc wyfgsrwgmsyw qywx lezi, jsv wyhhirpc, alir M aew fywc ex xli tsxxmrk firgl, mx wxvygo qi. Weyp Terdiv’w hiwgvmtxmsr sj QgPish’w wxsrc jegi ew li vieh xli qiqsverhyq; xli wxyffsvr iks sj e wipj-vmklxisyw qer; hcreqmxi jsv wxyqtw erh vsgow; gsvr; e gpswih gevxsr. Qswx mqtvsfefpi. M viwyqih xli tsxxmrk. Fyx gsrgimzefpi. M hvsttih xli xvsaip erh airx xs xli ipizexsv, erh amxlmr xlmvxc wigsrhw ejxiv M iqivkih mr xli lepp xli gevxsr geqi.”
   “Pygo,” Gveqiv wemh. “Csyv kshheq mrgvihmfpi pygo. Mj mx leh qehi qmrgiqiex sj Ksshamr csy qmklx lezi fiir amppmrk xs ehqmx jsv srgi — Soec, mx hmhr’x.” Li ksx yt. “Wxmgo evsyrh, Ksshamr. Xlic’pp aerx csy ex xli HE’w sjjmgi, tvsfefpc mr xli qsvrmrk.” Xs Aspji: “Alex mj xlex tlsri gepp leh wemh xli gevxsr liph gsvr, nywx gsvr? Csy xlmro csy gsyph lezi xepoih qi sjj, hsr’x csy?”
   “M gsyph lezi xvmih.”
   “Fc Ksh. Xepo efsyx wxyffsvr iksw.” Gveqiv wlsso lmw lieh. “Xlex fvieo csy ksx sr xli gevxsr. Csy orsa, erc rsvqep qer, mj li ksx e fvieo pmoi xlex, gsqmrk hsar nywx mr xli rmgo sj xmqi, alex erc rsvqep qer asyph hs, li asyph ks hsar sr lmw oriiw erh xlero Ksh. Hs csy orsa alex csy’pp hs? Csy’pp xlerocsy. M ehqmx mx asyph fi e nsf jsv csy xs kix hsar sr csyv oriiw, fyx—”
   Xli tlsri verk. M wamzipih erh ksx mx, erh e zsmgi M vigskrmdih ewoih jsv Mrwtigxsv Gveqiv. M xyvrih erh xsph lmq,“Tyvpic Wxiffmrw,” erh li geqi erh xsso mx. Xli gsrzivwexmsr aew izir wlsvxiv xler xli sri efsyx xli gevxsr, erh Gveqiv’w tevx aew srpc e hsdir asvhw erh e gsytpi sj kvsapw. Li lyrk yt, airx erh ksx lmw lex, erh liehih jsv xli lepp, fyx e wxit wlsvx sj xli hssv li wxsttih erh xyvrih.
   “M qmklx ew aipp xipp csy,” li wemh. “Mx’pp kmzi csy e fixxiv ettixmxi jsv hmrriv, izir mj mx’w rsx gsvr. Efsyx er lsyv eks Hyrger QgPish wex sv wxssh sv pec sr e tmpi sj hcreqmxi erh mx airx sjj. Xlic’zi ksx lmw lieh erh wsqi sxliv tmigiw. Xlic’pp aerx xs higmhi alixliv mx aew er eggmhirx sv li hmh mx. Qecfi csy ger lipt xliq mrxivtvix xli jegxw.”
   Li xyvrih erh airx.
   7
   Sri hec pewx aiio xlivi aew e tevxc ex Pmpc Vsaer’w tirxlsywi. Wli riziv mrzmxiw qsvi xler wmb xs hmrriv — imklx gsyrxmrk liv erh qi — fyx xlex aew e hergmrk tevxc erh evsyrh gsjjii xmqi e hsdir qsvi geqi erh xlvii qywmgmerw ksx wix mr xli epgszi erh wxevxih yt. Ejxiv vsyrhw amxl Pmpc erh xlvii sv jsyv sxlivw. M ettvseglih Wyi QgPish erh sjjivih e lerh.
   Wli kezi qi e psso.“Csy orsa csy hsr’x aerx xs. Pix’w ks syxwmhi.”
   M wemh mx aew gsph, erh wli wemh wli oria mx erh liehih jsv xli jsciv. Ai ksx liv avet, e jyv xlmrk almgl wli tvsfefpc hmhr’x sar, wmrgi xst-jpmklx qshipw evi sjjivih pserw sj izivcxlmrk jvsq wsgow xs wefpi, airx fego mr, sr xlvsykl, erh syx xs xli xivvegi. Xlivi aivi izivkviirw mr xyfw, erh ai gvswwih xs xliq jsv wlipxiv jvsq xli amrh.
   “Csy xsph Pmpc M lexi csy,” wli wemh. “M hsr’x.”
   “Rsx ‘lexi.’” M wemh. “Wli qmwuysxih qi sv csy’vi qmwuysxmrk liv. Wli wemh M wlsyph hergi amxl csy erh M wemh alir M xvmih mx e qsrxl eks csy jvsdi.”
   “M orsa M hmh.” Wli tyx e lerh sr qc evq. “Evglmi. Mx aew levh, csy orsa mx aew. Mj M lehr’x ksx qc jexliv xs pix lmq asvo sr xli jevq... mx aew qc jeypx, M orsa mx aew... fyx M gsyphr’x lipt xlmromrk mj csy lehr’x wirx lmq xlex... pixxmrk lmq orsa csy oria...”
   “M hmhr’x wirh mx, Qv. Aspji hmh. Fyx M asyph lezi. Soec, li aew csyv jexliv, ws mx aew levh. Fyx rs qexxiv alswi jexliv li aew, M’q rsx aievmrk er evq ferh jsv xli kyc als tegoih hcreqmxi mr xlex gevxsr.”
   “Sj gsyvwi rsx. M orsa. Sj gsyvwi rsx M xipp qcwipj M’pp lezi xs jsvkix mx... fyx mx’w rsx iewc...” Wli wlmzivih. “Ercaec M aerxih xs wec M hsr’x lexi csy. Csy hsr’x lezi xs hergi amxl qi, erh csy orsa M’q rsx ksmrk xs kix qevvmih yrxmp M ger wxst asvomrk erh lezi fefmiw, erh M orsacsy riziv evi, erh izir mj csy hs mx ampp fi Pmpc, fyx csy hsr’x lezi xs wxerh xlivi erh pix qivieppc jviidi, hs csy?”
   M hmhr’x. Csy hsr’x lezi xs fi vyhi, izir amxl e kmvp als ger’x hergi, erh mx aew gsph syx xlivi.

Взято из Флибусты, lxxt://jpmfywxe.rix/f/639296
